<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89321-0007 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.3-21-89.f2.A1006</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FEDERAL DEPOSIT INSURANCE CORPORATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Part 325</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Capital Maintenance; Final Statement of Policy on Risk-Based Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Since early 1985, the FDIC has employed minimum supervisoryleverage ratios of primary and total capital to total assets in assessingthe capital adequacy of state-chartered banks that are not members of theFederal Reserve System (``state nonmember banks''). While these ratiosof capital to total assets have served as useful tools for assessing capitaladequacy, the FDIC has determined that there is a need for a capital measurethat is more explicitly and systematically sensitive to the risk profilesof individual banks.In this regard, the FDIC and the other U.S. Federal banking agencies firstproposed in early 1986, and again in 1987 in conjunction with the Bankof England, the adoption of a risk-based capital measure that would takeexplicit account of broad differences in risks among a bank's assets andoff-balance sheet items. The FDIC deferred final action on these earlierproposals in order to participate in the development of a more broadlybased capital framework that would be applicable to international banks.As a result of consultations with supervisory authorities from certainmajor industrial countries, the FDIC, on March 15, 1988, issued for publiccomment a revised risk-based capital framework that superseded the previousproposals. The revised proposal was based upon a risk-based capital frameworkdeveloped jointly by supervisory authorities from the 12 countries thatare represented on the Basle Committee on Banking Regulations and SupervisoryPractices. The comment period for the FDIC's proposal ended on May 13, 1988. Commentsaddressing various aspects of its proposal were received from over 150respondents. Based upon the comments received, discussions with the otherU.S. banking agencies, and further consultation with international supervisoryauthorities, the FDIC has modified its March 1988 proposal and is now issuingin final form its revised risk-based capital framework as a Statement ofPolicy on Risk-Based Capital. The FDIC's adoption of this statement of policy achieves important goalslong sought by U.S. banking supervisors. First, it establishes a risk-basedcapital framework that is more sensitive than the current leverage ratiosto risk factors, including off-balance sheet exposures. Second, it encouragesinternational banks to strengthen their capital positions. Finally, itmitigates a source of competitive inequity arising from different supervisorycapital requirements across countries. The risk-based capital guidelines represent a major step in the processof coordination with regulatory authorities of other countries to establishappropriate capital standards for banks, in accordance with the InternationalLending Supervision Act of 1983. In that regard, the FDIC notes that theregulatory authorities of the 12 major industrial countries intend to issueappropriate directives to those banks under their supervision, in orderto facilitate implementation of the risk-based capital framework on aninternational basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>The framework for calculating risk-based capitalratios will take effect on April 20, 1989. The interim 7.25 percent minimumsupervisory ratio reflected in the framework's transitional provisionsbecomes effective on December 31, 1990. The final 8 percent minimum supervisoryratio will become effective on December 31, 1992, the date on which thetransition period ends.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Robert F. Miailovich, AssistantDirector, Division of Bank Supervision (202/898-6918), or Stephen G. Pfeifer,Examination Specialist, Securities and Accounting Section (202/898-8904).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>In 1986, and again in 1987 in conjunctionwith the Bank of England, the Federal banking agencies issued for publiccomment risk-based capital proposals applicable to U.S. banks. The principalobjectives of these early proposals were: (1) To develop more systematicprocedures for factoring on- and off-balance sheet risks into supervisoryassessements of capital adequacy; (2) to reduce disincentives to holdingliquid, low-risk assets; and (3) to foster coordination among supervisoryauthorities from major industrial countries, many of which employ risk-sensitivecapital measures.These risk-based capital proposals were consistent with one of the majorgoals of the International Lending Supervision Act of 1983 (``ILSA''),12 U.S.C. 3901 <T3>et seq., </T3>which was to strengthen the bank regulatory frameworkby encouraging greater coordination among regulatory authorities in differentcountries. In addition to enhancing the banking agencies' authority toestablish and enforce minimum levels of capital for U.S. banks, this Actinstructed those agencies to work with governments, central banks, andregulatory authorities of other countries to maintain and, where necessary,strengthen the capital positions of banking institutions involved in internationallending. The FDIC deferred final action on the 1986 and 1987 proposals in orderto participate in the development of a more broadly based capital frameworkthat would be applicable to international banks from the major industrialcountries. In December 1987, the Basle Committee on Banking Regulationsand Supervisory Practices (``Basle Supervisors' Committee'') issued a consultativepaper (the ``Basle Accord'') containing proposals for a risk-based capitalframework.\1\<NOTE/> The principal objectives of the framework were to achievegreater convergence in the measurement and assessment of capital adequacyinternationally and to strengthen the capital positions of major internationalbanks. That document served as the basis for consultations and public commentin the Group of Ten (``G-10'') countries. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Basle Supervisors' Committee is comprised of representativesof the central banks and supervisory authorities from the Group of Tencountries (Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the Netherlands,Sweden, Switzerland, the United Kingdom, and the United States), and Luxembourg.In the United States, the vehicle for consultation and public comment tookthe form of proposed risk-based capital guidelines, which were based uponthe December 1987 Basle Accord, and which the FDIC, together with the otherFederal banking agencies, issued for public comment on March 15, 1988 (53Fed. Reg. 8550 (1988)). Although the comment period on the FDIC's proposedStatement of Policy on Risk-Based Capital formally ended on May 13, 1988,the FDIC continued to receive and consider comments after that date. Over150 comment letters were received that addressed various aspects of theproposed risk-based capital framework. A number of changes were made by the Basle Supervisors' Committee to theDecember 1987 Basle Accord in light of comments received by both domesticand foreign banking authorities and as a result of consultations amongthe G-10 countries. A revised July 1988 Basle Accord, endorsed by the centralbank governors of the G-10 countries on July 11, 1988, reflects these changes.\2\<NOTE/> The FDIC is now issuing in final form its Statement of Policyon Risk-Based Capital, revised in light of the public comments receivedin response to the March 1988 proposal, the ongoing consultative processamong the G-10 countries, and discussions with the other U.S. banking agencies.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The Basle Accord is described in a paper prepared by theBasle Supervisors' Committee entitled ``International Convergence of CapitalMeasurement and Capital Standards,'' dated July 1988.The development of a risk-based framework in conjunction with supervisoryofficials from other industrial countries acknowledges the growing internationalizationof major banking and financial markets throughout the world. The harmonizationand strengthening of capital standards worldwide should contribute to amore stable and resilient international banking system and help mitigatea source of competitive inequality for international banks stemming fromdifferences in national supervisory capital requirements.The FDIC statement of policy applies to all FDIC-insured state-charteredbanks (excluding insured branches of foreign banks) that are not membersof the Federal Reserve System (``state nonmember banks''), regardless ofsize, and to all circumstances in which the FDIC is required to evaluatethe capital of a banking organization. Therefore, the risk-based capitalframework set forth in this statement of policy will be used in the examinationand supervisory process, as well as in the analysis of applications thatthe FDIC is required to act upon. Similar risk-based capital guidelinesare also being adopted by the Federal banking agencies that have primarysupervisory authority over state member banks and national banks.Although the Basle Accord is specifically directed to international banks,the FDIC will apply the risk-based capital framework to all the state nonmemberbanks under its jurisdiction, since the FDIC believes that the underlyingrationale behind the use of a risk-based capital approach applies to smalldomestic banks as well as large international banking organizations.The final statement of policy contemplates, as did the March 1988 proposal,that the calculation of a risk-based capital ratio is only one step inevaluating capital adequacy. The focus of the risk-based capital frameworkis principally based on broad categories of credit risk. As a result, theframework does not take explicit account of many other factors that canaffect a bank's financial condition, such as overall interest rate exposure;liquidity, funding and market risks; the quality and level of earnings;investment or loan portfolio concentrations; the quality of loans and investments;the effectiveness of loan and investment policies; and management's overallability to monitor and control financial and operating risks.A complete assessment of capital adequacy must take account of each ofthese other considerations including, in particular, the level and severityof problem and classified assets. Thus, the risk-based capital ratio isbut one element in the assessment of overall capital adequacy, and thefinal supervisory judgment of a bank's capital adequacy may differ significantlyfrom conclusions that might be drawn solely from the absolute level ofthe bank's risk-based capital ratio. In light of these other considerations,state nonmember banks generally will be expected to operate above the minimumrisk-based capital ratio. Banks contemplating significant expansion plans,as well as those institutions with high or inordinate levels of risk, shouldhold capital commensurate with the level and nature of the risks to whichthey are exposed.The risk-based capital framework consists of (1) a <T3>definition of capital</T3> for risk-based capital purposes, (2) a systemfor calculating <T3>risk-weighted assets</T3> by assigning assets and off-balance sheetitems to one of four broad risk weight categories, and (3) a schedule,which includes transitional arrangements during a phase-in period, forachieving a <T3>minimum supervisory ratio</T3> of capital to risk-weighted assets.A bank's risk-based capital ratio is calculated by dividing its qualifyingtotal capital base (the numerator) by its risk-weighted assets (the denominator).Table I of the statement of policy outlines the definition of capital usedfor risk-based capital purposes, Table II summarizes the risk weights andrisk categories, and Table III sets forth the credit conversion factorsfor off-balance sheet items.This final risk-based capital framework includes a number of changes tothe March 1988 proposed statement of policy. These changes are based, inpart, on the public comments received by the FDIC. Most respondents expressedgeneral support for the concept of a risk-based capital measure; however,many objected to specific aspects of the proposed framework. In addition,some respondents expressed the view that the risk-based capital proposalmight adversely affect the ability of banks to compete with nonbank financialinstitutions that are not subject to similar standards.Comments on the framework covered the proposed capital definition, thetreatment of assets and off-balance sheet activities, and the types ofbanks to which the risk-based framework should be applied. The principalconcerns regarding the definition of capital focused on the treatment ofperpetual preferred stock, loan loss reserves, and intangible assets suchas goodwill. Comments on risk weights addressed the proposed treatmentof claims involving country transfer risk, claims on domestic and foreigncentral governments, claims on local governments, claims on multilaterallending institutions, claims on government-sponsored agencies, claims ondomestic and foreign banks, claims backed by private sector financial guarantees,and claims in the form of residential mortgages and mortgage-backed securities.With respect to off-balance sheet items, the major comments related tothe recognition of counterparty netting arrangements and the credit conversionfactor for long-term foreign exchange rate contracts.Comments were also received on the use of original, rather than remaining,maturity in both the assignment of risk weights to long-term claims onforeign banks and the assignment of credit conversion factors to commitments.Some commenters also addressed the use of average, versus period-end, datain calculating the risk-based capital ratio. Finally, a number of respondentscommented on the relationship of the risk-based capital ratio to the FDIC'sexisting Part 325 capital maintenance regulation, as well as the applicationof the risk-based framework to small banks.Sections I through III below describe modifications to the March 1988 proposalthat the FDIC has adopted as a result of public comments received on theproposal, changes incorporated into the July 1988 Basle Accord, and thecontinuing consultative process within the Basle Supervisors' Committee.Section I outlines revisions made to the definition of capital, SectionII describes changes in the treatment of assets and off-balance sheet exposures,and Section III deals with the implementation of the risk-based framework.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Definition of Capital</ITAG>The final risk-based capital framework sets forth a definition of capitalfor state nonmember banks that is substantially similar to that containedin the March 1988 proposal. This section reviews comments received on,and revisions made in, the treatment of three elements of capital_perpetualpreferred stock, loan loss reserves, and term subordinated debt. The treatmentof intangible assets within the risk-based framework is also discussed.<T3>A. Perpetual Preferred Stock</T3>Consistent with the December 1987 Basle Accord, the March 1988 proposedguidelines stated that, for supervisory purposes, capital would consistof two tiers: Tier I capital, comprising core capital elements; and Tier2 capital, comprising supplementary capital elements. Tier I capital wasdefined to include common stockholders' equity capital, including disclosedcapital reserves and minority interests in consolidated subsidiaries. However,perpetual preferred stock was excluded from the definition of Tier 1 capital.Over 35 respondents addressed the treatment of preferred stock, with nearlyall of them arguing that perpetual preferred stock should count as an elementof Tier 1 capital. These commenters suggested that perpetual preferredstock, in terms of its ability to absorb losses, serves as a nearly perfectsubstitute for common equity because it is permanent, it is subordinateto the claims of depositors and general creditors, and preferred dividendscan be deferred without triggering an act of default. Some respondentsfavored including only limited amounts of perpetual preferred stock withinTier 1, while others took the position that regulators should define thecharacteristics of preferred stock that may be of some supervisory concernand exclude from Tier 1 only those forms of preferred stock that possesssuch characteristics. Several respondents noted that perpetual preferredstock is the most expensive form of Tier 2 capital, and suggested thatoutstanding issues of such stock might be redeemed if not given Tier 1treatment.In its March 1988 proposal the FDIC excluded all perpetual preferred stockfrom Tier 1 capital in view of certain structural differences that existbetween common stock and perpetual preferred stock. First, it is very difficult,if not impossible, to issue new common stock if there exists large dividendarrearages on preferred stock that must be repaid before common shareholderscan receive dividends. Second, preferred dividends, unlike common dividends,are often fixed or set in relation to an external market index, ratherthan based upon the bank's earnings. Third, the prior claim on earningsassociated with many forms of preferred stock gives these instruments someof the characteristics of debt obligations. Finally, most forms of preferredstock lack voting rights under normal circumstances.However, consistent with the revised Basle Accord, the FDIC has modifiedits definition of Tier 1 capital for state nonmember banks to include <T3>noncumulative</T3> perpetual preferred stock \3\<NOTE/> in Tier 1 capital. Cumulative preferred stock, on the otherhand, remains as part of Tier 2 capital. Perpetual preferred stock thathas a <T3>noncumulative</T3> feature is a closer substitute for common stockthan cumulative preferred stock, since any dividend payments that havebeen waived do not represent a contingent claim on the issuer. Despitethe inclusion of noncumulative perpetual preferred stock in Tier 1, theFDIC believes that, from a supervisory standpoint, it is desirable thatvoting common shareholders' equity remain the dominant form of Tier 1 capital.Thus, state nonmember banks are expected to avoid undue reliance on suchother forms of Tier 1 capital as nonvoting common, noncumulative perpetualpreferred and minority interests in consolidated subsidiaries.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Perpetual preferred stock is defined as preferred stockthat has no maturity date, that cannot be redeemed at the option of theholder of the instrument, and that has no other provisions that will requirefuture redemption of the issue.The decision to include noncumulative perpetual preferred stock in Tier1 raised the question of whether there are some specific forms of noncumulativepreferred stock that possess features that do not warrant such favorabletreatment. In this regard, the FDIC believes that auction rate preferredstock (including so-called ``Dutch auction'' preferred stock) has certainfeatures that do not allow it to fulfill the supervisory purposes of Tier1 capital and, hence, has excluded such stock from Tier 1 capital. Auction-ratepreferred stock refers to those types of preferred stock (including moneymarket and remarketable preferred stock) where the dividend is reset periodicallybased to some degree upon the bank's current credit rating.A number of supervisory concerns stem from this type of instrument. Ifsufficient buyers are not interested in holding the stock at the maximumrate at which it can be offered, the auction is said to have failed. This,in itself, can raise questions about the issuer's financial standing andsubject the issuer to pressure from unhappy or unwilling investors to repurchasethe outstanding stock. In addition, the very fact that the preferred stockdividend yield can rise when a bank's financial condition or credit ratingis deteriorating can exacerbate the institution's financial difficulties.In light of these considerations, the FDIC believes that the auction ratefeatures of such preferred shares render them inconsistent with the notionof Tier 1 instruments as the highest quality form of capital. As a result,auction-rate perpetual preferred stock will qualify only as an elementof Tier 2 capital.Although auction rate preferred stock is not included in Tier 1, the risk-basedguidelines do not prohibit the inclusion of noncumulative floating rateor adjustable rate perpetual preferred stock in Tier 1 capital, so longas the yield on these instruments is based <T3>solely</T3> on general market interest rates and is not subject toan auction mechanism that requires or allows the rate to vary in relationto the financial standing or credit rating of the issuer.B. Allowance for Loan and Lease LossesRecognizing that it is not always possible to distinguish clearly betweengeneral and specific reserves, the December 1987 Basle Accord proposedphasing in a limit on the amount of general loan loss reserves includablein Tier 2 capital. By the end of 1992, the allowance for loan and leaselosses included in Tier 2 capital cannot exceed <T3>1.25 percent</T3> of risk-weighted assets.The FDIC's March 1988 proposaltreated the allowance for loan and lease losses as Tier 2 capital up tothis limit and, consistent with the Basle Accord, excluded from capitalany specific reserves established against identified losses.The majority of comments received from the more than 30 U.S. respondentsthat addressed the proposed treatment of loan loss reserves suggested eitherone or both of the following: (1) including general reserves in Tier 1capital, and (2) raising or eliminating the proposed limits on the amountof these reserves that can be included in the definition of capital. Banksin many other G-10 countries, on the other hand, have expressed the viewthat certain types of reserves, such as those established against loansto less developed countries, are <T3>not</T3> freely available to absorb losses and that, in many G-10 countries,such reserves are excluded from bank capital. These banks accordingly haveargued for the exclusion of all such reserves from capital.Under generally accepted accounting principles, the loan loss allowanceaccount reflected by U.S. banks takes the form of a valuation adjustmentagainst the bank's entire loan portfolio. these adjustments represent lossesinherent or anticipated within the existing portfolio but that have notyet been identified to individual loans. Because capital is intended toserve as a buffer against unanticipated losses, it would appear appropriateto exclude such reserves from Tier 1 capital and to place such reservesin Tier 2 capital subject to the limits contained in the Basle Accord.The amount of reserves includable in Tier 2 is generally consistent withthe amount of loan loss reserves that historically were included in U.S.bank capital up until 1987, when certain larger banks first establishedlarge reserves against country transfer risk exposures to certain lessdeveloped countries.During the transition period, the Basle Supervisors' Committee intendsto continue to try to reach an agreement on the types of reserves thatare truly general in nature and, therefore, freely available to absorblosses anywhere in the portfolio. If an acceptable agreement is reached,then the Basle Accord and these risk-based guidelines would be revisedto permit the inclusion of unlimited amounts of such general reserves withinTier 2. If an acceptable agreement is not reached, then the amount of generalreserves includable in Tier 2 capital by the end of the transition periodwill be limited to 1.25 percent of risk-weighted assets, as proposed inthe FDIC's March 1988 proposal and subsequently set forth in the revisedJuly 1988 Basle Accord.<T3>C. Term Subordinated Debt Instruments</T3>The December 1987 Basle proposal included term subordinated debt instrumentswith a fixed term to maturity as a limited element of Tier 2 capital butdid not specify a minimum term to maturity for these instruments. Consistentwith the FDIC's existing capital regulation, the March 1988 proposal statedthat subordinated debt issues and limited-life preferred stock must havea minimum original weighted average maturity of at least seven years toqualify for inclusion in Tier 2 capital. The revised Basle Accord specifiesthat term debt instruments must have a minimum original term to maturityof over five years to qualify for inclusion in Tier 2. Accordingly, theFDIC's final statement of policy provides that term subordinated debt instrumentsand intermediate-term preferred stock with an original average weightedmaturity of at least five years are includable as limited elements withinTier 2.<T3>D. Intangible Assets </T3>Over 30 respondents addressed the treatment of intangible assets in thecalculation of the amount of Tier 1 capital, with most of the commentersobjecting to the FDIC's proposal requiring the deduction of all intangibleassets (other than mortgage servicing rights) from the Tier 1 capital elements.Most of the respondents believed that goodwill and other intangible assetsshould not be immediately deducted from capital for risk-based capitalpurposes, but rather should be amortized out of capital over a reasonableperiod of time.Banks strongly opposed the proposed deduction of goodwill and other intangibleassets for several reasons.\4\<NOTE/> First, they argued that intangible assets have realizablevalue. Second, they stated their belief that the deduction places banksat a competitive disadvantage relative to nonbank competitors in biddingfor acquisitions. Third, they argued that the deduction would hamper theprocess of domestic banking consolidation in the United States by effectivelyeliminating purchase accounting as a viable method of consummating mergersand acquisitions. Many respondents also indicated that the deduction ofintangible assets is contrary both to generally accepted accounting principlesand existing regulatory accounting practices. Because of these concerns,several commenters argued that at least a limited amount of goodwill andother intangible assets (generally, 25 percent) should be allowed in Tier1 capital.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Intangible assets (other than mortgage servicing rights)are deducted from a state nonmember bank's capital accounts when determiningthe amount of regulatory capital under the FDIC's existing Part 325 capitalmaintenance regulation. Thus, the treatment of intangible assets set forthin the FDIC's March 1988 risk-based capital proposal was consistent withexisting FDIC policy. In this regard, rather than specifically addressingthe treatment of intangible assets held by banks, many of the commentsreceived by the FDIC actually focused primarily on the treatment underthe Federal Reserve's proposed risk-based capital guidelines for intangibleassets held by <T3>bank holding companies. </T3>A discussion of how the Federal Reservewill treat intangible assets held by bank holding companies is includedin their final risk-based capital guidelines, which were published in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>on January 27, 1989.The uncertainty often associated with determining the future benefits anduseful lives of intangible assets raises supervisory concerns. During periodsof financial adversity, some intangibles may not provide the degree ofsupport that is normally expected from a bank's assets. As a result, theFDIC has decided to treat intangible assets for risk-based capital purposesas initially proposed and thereby require the deduction of all intangibleassets (other than mortgage servicing rights) when calculating the amountof Tier 1 capital. This treatment of intangible assets is consistent withthat applied to state nonmember banks under the FDIC's existing Part 325capital maintenance regulation. In reaching this determination, the FDICevaluated several general characteristics of different classes of intangibleassets, including:(1) The separability of the intangible asset and the ability to sell itapart from the bank or from the bulk of the bank's assets;(2) The certainty that a readily identifiable stream of cash flows associatedwith the intangible asset can hold its value notwithstanding the futureprospects of the bank; and(3) The existence of a market of sufficient depth to provide liquidityfor the intangible asset.In evaluating the above characteristics, the FDIC believes that mortgageservicing rights, as a class of intangible assets, generally possess characteristicsthat allow for their favorable treatment for supervisory capital purposes.Although this favorable treatment is not extended to any other class ofintangible assets, the FDIC retains the flexibility to recognize for risk-basedcapital purposes any other intangible assets that have been explicitlyapproved by the FDIC as part of the bank's regulatory capital on a specificcase basis. Even though intangible assets in the form of mortgage servicingrights will generally be favorably recognized for risk-based capital purposes,the deduction of part or all of these rights from Tier 1 capital may berequired if the carrying amounts of the mortgage servicing rights are excessivein relation to their market value or the level of the bank's capital accounts.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Risk Weight Treatment for Assets and Off-Balance Sheet Items</ITAG>A. Claims Involving Country Transfer RiskThe December 1987 Basle Accord and the March 1988 FDIC proposal did notattempt to incorporate transfer risk into the risk-based capital framework.In general, claims on all <T3>foreign </T3>governments and banks were treated alike, without distinguishingamong the countries involved, and these claims received less favorablerisk weights than claims on similar <T3>domestic </T3>institutions. Banks in European Community (``EC'') countries,however, were permitted to treat claims on institutions in member countriesas domestic claims.This aspect of the March proposal generally met with citicism from foreignbanks and large U.S. banks, which noted that the treatment accorded tolong-term claims on foreign banks and claims guaranteed by foreign banksmight disrupt the interbank market and create disincentives for U.S. banksto convey risk participations to foreign banks. Some commenters also arguedthat the preferential treatment accorded banks in EC countries gave theseinstitutions a competitive advantage in dealing with each other. Othersargued for equal, low-risk treatment for claims on banks and governmentsfrom a group of countries identified as being of high credit quality, suchas the signatories to the Basle Accord or the members of the Organizationfor Economic Cooperation and Development (``OECD'').Taking into account these comments, and consistent with the revised July1988 Basle Accord, the final FDIC statement of policy treats claims ongovernments and banks of a defined group of countries, which includes membersof the OECD and countries that have concluded special lending arrangementswith the International Monetary Fund (``IMF'') associated with its GeneralArrangements to Borrow (the OECD-based group of countries),\5\<NOTE/> in the same manner as claims on similar domestic institutions.Claims on central governments of other countries are assigned to the 100percent risk category unless such claims are denominated in local currencyand funded in local currency liabilities, in which case the claims maybe assigned to the same zero percent risk weight that is used for claimson OECD central governments. Short-term claims on banks domiciled in countriesthat do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries will receive thesame 20 percent risk weight assigned to claims on domestic banks; however,long-term claims (remaining maturity of over one year) on banks from non-OECDcountries will receive a 100 percent risk weight.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ The OECD includes the following countries: Australia,Austria, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, the Federal Republic of Germany, Finland,France, Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, the Netherlands,New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, theUnited Kingdom, and the United States. Saudi Arabia has concluded speciallending arrangements with the IMF associated with the Fund's General Arrangementsto Borrow.B. Long-Term Claims on Central GovernmentsThe December 1987 Basle Accord assigned claims on domestic central governments(including claims guaranteed by domestic central governments or collateralizedby the securities) to the zero or low risk category to reflect the presumedabsence of credit risk. National supervisors were granted discretion, however,to place some of these claims, including long-term claims, in a slightlyhigher risk category in order to capture a degree of market and interestrate risk. Accordingly, the risk-based framework proposed in March 1988assigned a zero percent risk weight to securities (direct obligations)issued by the U.S. Government with a remaining maturity of 91 days or lessand a 10 percent risk weight to similar claims of over 91 days.A 10 percent risk weight also was assigned to all claims guaranteed bythe U.S. Government or collateralized by its securities.A number of respondents to the March 1988 proposal disagreed with the proposedmethod for incorporating interest rate risk because it did not take intoaccount all assets, liabilities, and off-balance sheet transactions. Somecommenters argued that all government obligations, long- and short-term,should be assigned to the zero percent risk category due to the absenceof credit risk. Others expressed concern about the framework's lack ofa more sophisticated approach to interest rate risk, arguing that placinglong-term government bonds in the zero percent risk category could imply(incorrectly) that there are no risks to holding such instruments.In addition, some commenters opposed the proposed maturity split for governmentsecurities on the grounds that it would place U.S. banks at a competitivedisadvantage to banks in other G-10 countries since, in the view of therespondents, most G-10 countries intended to assign a zero percent riskweight to all claims on their domestic central governments, regardlessof maturity. In light of the recognition of country transfer risk now incorporatedinto the risk-based capital framework, the zero percent risk weight wouldapply not only to claims on the domestic central government, but also toclaims on, and guaranteed by, foreign central governments of the OECD-basedgroup of countries.After careful consideration of all of the above factors and consultationwith the other U.S. Federal banking agencies, the FDIC has decided to eliminatethe distinction between long- and short-term OECD central government securitiesand has decided to assign all such securities, as well as all claims <T3>unconditionally</T3> guaranteed by the full faith and credit of OECDcentral governments, to the lowest (zero percent) risk category.Thus, with respect to the United States, all direct U.S. Treasury obligationsare assigned to the zero percent risk weight. This category would generallyinclude all securities with unconditional guarantees by the U.S. Governmentor its agencies intended to facilitate their active trading in the financialmarkets, including Government National Mortgage Association (``GNMA'')pass-through securities. Loans guaranteed by the U.S. Export-Import Bank(``Eximbank'') are also generally assigned to the zero percent risk weightcategory. This approach has the benefit of restricting the lowest riskcategory to only those central government obligations in the form of directclaims on or claims unconditionally guaranteed by the OECD-based centralgovernments. By eliminating the maturity break on central government securities,this approach also simplifies the risk-based framework and effectivelyeliminates the need for the 10 percent risk category that was set forthin the March 1988 proposal. As a consequence, this final statement of policyincludes only four risk categories (0, 20, 50 and 100 percent), as opposedto the five risk weights used in the March proposal.Claims that are <T3>conditionally</T3> guaranteed by OECD central governments (includingthe U.S. Government and its agencies) are assigned to the 20 percent riskcategory. If the validity of the guarantee to the holder (beneficiary)of the claim is dependent upon some affirmative action (e.g., servicingrequirements) by the holder or a third party, then the guarantee is notconsidered unconditional. For example, in the case of the United States,such claims generally would include portions of loans guaranteed undercertain programs administered by the Federal Housing Administration (FHA),the Small Business Administration (SBA), and the Veterans Administration(VA). All claims <T3>collateralized</T3> by securities issued by OECD-based central governments(including the U.S. Government and its agencies) will generally be assignedto the 20 percent risk category. The FDIC believes that this treatmentis appropriate since, as a general matter, such secured claims on privateobligors are not in all respects equivalent, from a risk standpoint, tothe direct holding of central government debt securities. Moreover, restrictingthe zero percent category to direct holdings of government securities andobligations unconditionally guaranteed by the government lessens supervisoryconcerns regarding the volume and riskiness of assets assigned the zeropercent risk weight.Assigning long-term direct government obligations to the zero percent riskcategory differs from past FDIC proposals, but this treatment should notbe interpreted as suggesting that the holding of such instruments involveslittle or no risk. The FDIC's previous concerns over the assignment oflong-term government securities to the zero percent risk category are mitigatedby the decision among the U.S. banking agencies to retain an overall leverageconstraint (see Section III). Retaining a leveage ratio does, in fact,ensure a minimum capital charge for central government securities, togetherwith all other assets, and precludes the possibility of excessive leveragingof the government securities portfolio. Moreover, examiners will continueto carefuly scrutinize banks' interest rate risk exposures and will requireinstitutions with inordinate levels of interest rate risk to strengthentheir capital positions, even though they may meet the minimum capitalstandards. In addition, the FDIC will continue to work with the other domesticand international supervisory authorities to develop better proceduresfor measuring and assessing interest rate risk.C. Claims on the Non-Central (Local) Government Public SectorThe July 1988 revised Basle Accord continues to provide for national discretionin assigning risk weights to claims on domestic local governments. However,the framework generally assigns a standard 20 percent risk weight to claimson, or guaranteed by, foreign local governments of the OECD-based groupof countries.The FDIC's March 1988 proposal assigned a 20 percent risk weight to <T3>general </T3>obligation (full faith and credit) claims on a domesticlocal government, as well as to all claims guaranteed by the full faithand credit of a domestic local government. It also assigned a 50 percentrisk weight to local domestic government <T3>revenue </T3>obligations for which the government entity is committedto repay the debt only with revenues from the facilities financed, ratherthan from general tax funds. Consistent with the December 1987 Basle proposal,revenue obligations issued by local governments for the benefit of <T3>private entities </T3>that are committed to repay the principal andinterest were accorded a 100 percent risk weight, as were claims on, orguaranteed by, foreign local government entities.Several commenters suggested that all public sector claims that a localgovernment is committed to repay (including revenue bonds) receive a 20percent risk weight. In their view, assigning a 20 percent or 50 percentrisk weight to such obligations based on the source of repayment wouldcreate unwarranted distinctions among classes of state and municipal debt.The FDIC has decided to retain the proposed risk weights for claims ondomestic local governments and, consistent with the Basle framework, toextend the same treatment to similar claims on foreign local governmentsof the OECD-based group of countries. Also consistent with the Basle framework,a 100 percent risk weight is assigned to all claims on local governmententities of countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries.Financial guaranty insurance industry commenters objected to an aspectof the March 1988 proposal related to the treatment accorded to local governmentrevenue obligations. Consistent with the Basle framework, the proposalrecognized bank, but not nonbank, guarantees of local government obligations.Eight commenters argued that the proposal's preferential treatment forbank-issued guarantees creates an incentive for banks to hold local governmentrevenue obligations backed by bank-issued standbys, which would have a20 percent risk weight, rather than similar obligations backed by tripleA-rated financial guaranty insurance companies, which would have a 50 percentor 100 percent risk weight, depending upon the nature of the underlyingobligor.Because the Basle Accord does not recognize nonbank private sector guaranteesor take private sector credit ratings into account in assigning assetsto risk categories, recognition or private sector financial guaranteesfor risk-based capital purposes, as urged by this group, would be inconsistentwith the framework agreed upon by the G-10 countries. Accordingly, thefinal guidelines do not recognize such guarantees. Nonetheless, the treatmentof private sector financial guarantees may be considered in the futurein connection with international discussions on refinements to the risk-basedcapital framework.D. Multilateral Lending Institutions and Regional Development BanksThe December 1987 Basle proposal granted national supervisory authoritiesdiscretion to assign a zero to 20 percent risk weight to claims on multilaterallending and regional development institutions but assigned a 100 percentrisk weight to claims guaranteed by these organizations or collateralizedby their securities. Several international organizations expressed concernthat proposals of member countries to the Accord inconsistently assignedrisk weights to claims on the same international institutions. Others supporteda 20 percent risk weight for <T3>all </T3>such institutions, and requested that this treatment be extendedto claims guaranteed by these entities and to claims collateralized bytheir securities.The final statement of policy reflects the revised Basle Accord's uniform20 percent risk weight for claims on five multilateral development banks_theAfrican Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the European InvestmentBank, the Inter-American Development Bank, and the World Bank_as well asfor claims guaranteed by these institutions or collateralized by theirsecurities. As permitted by the revised Basle Accord, the final guidelinesextend the same treatment to claims on similar institutions in which theUnited States is a shareholder or contributing member.E. Claims on Government-Sponsored AgenciesThe FDIC's March 1988 proposal assigned a preferential 20 percent riskweight to claims on U.S. Government-sponsored agencies \6\<NOTE/> to reflect their relatively low risk and what is viewed astheir special relationship with the U.S. Government. Of the 36 commentsreceived on this issue, about half, including some from government-sponsoredagencies themselves, offered support for the proposed 20 percent risk weight;the other half of the commenters generally advocated a lower 10 percentrisk weight, although a few supported an even higher 50 percent risk weight.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ Government-sponsored agencies are entities that were establishedor chartered by the U.S. Government to serve public purposes specifiedby the U.S. Congress but whose obligations do not carry the explicit fullfaith and credit guarantee of the U.S. Government.Respondents that opposed a risk weight lower than 20 percent pointed outthat government-sponsored agency securities lack the explicit full faithand credit backing of the U.S. Government. Respondents in favor of a lowerrisk weight contended that the market does not distinguish between thelevel of risk associated with these obligations and the risk associatedwith long-term claims on the U.S. Government and U.S. Government agencies,which the proposal weighted at 10 percent. A number of commenters, includingseveral Congressmen, opposed the differential between the 10 percent riskweight proposed for GNMA securities_which bear the full faith and creditguarantee of the U.S. Government_and the 20 percent risk weight assignedto Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (``FHLMC'') and Federal NationalMortgage Association (``FNMA'') securities_which do not explicitly bearsuch a guarantee_on the grounds that it would create tiering in the secondarymortgage market and raise mortgage costs for consumers.In view of the structure of the Basle framework, the FDIC has decided tomaintain the 20 percent risk weight for claims on all government-sponsoredagencies. The FDIC continues to believe that the debt obligations of government-sponsoredagencies should not be accorded the same treatment as other direct governmentobligations that carry the explicit U.S. Government guarantee.F. Real Estate Mortgages and Mortgage-Backed Securities<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Mortgages</ITAG>The FDIC's March 1988 proposal assigned a 100 percent risk weight to loanssecured by owner-occupied one-to-four family residential properties, ratherthan the preferential 50 percent risk weight proposed by the Basle Supervisors'Committee. In proposing not to apply the preferential weight, the FDICsought to avoid the appearance or reality of regulatory credit allocationamong private sector borrowers. Of the 52 commenters that addressed thisissue, an overwhelming majority opposed the proposed 100 percent risk weight.Respondents stated that it would place U.S. banks at a competitive disadvantagein both domestic and foreign mortgage markets and cited the historicallylow default rate on residential mortgages as a justification for a lowerrisk weight.Upon further consideration of this issue, the FDIC has decided to assigna preferential risk weight of 50 percent to loans secured by one-to-fourfamily residential properties. Consistent with the revised Basle Accord,the FDIC is extending this preferential risk weight to mortgages on one-to-fourfamily residential properties that are rented as well as owner-occupied.In this regard, the revised Basle Accord instructs national supervisoryauthorities to apply this preferential weight restrictively as to encompassonly residential purposes; that is, it is not to apply to speculative propertydevelopment. Moreover, national authorities are granted the latitude todevelop strict prudential criteria for the application of this low riskweight. Accordingly, the guidelines assign a 50 percent risk weight onlyto loans secured by <T3>first</T3> liens on <T3>one-to-four family</T3> residential properties that are <T3>not </T3>90 days or more past due or carried in nonaccrual status.The assignment of mortgages to the 50 percent risk weight category is basedon the presumption that banks will adhere to prudent and conservative underwritingstandards with respect to maximum loan-to-value ratio, the borrower's payingcapacity, and the long-term expectations for the real estate market inwhich the property is located. If, in the course of the supervisory process,it is determined that a bank has not adhered to such underwriting standards,the FDIC may require additional capital, increased reserves, or both, tobe maintained by the bank.This revised treatment for one-to-four family residential mortgages alsoaffects the risk weight assigned to the <T3>undrawn </T3>portion of home equity lines. As is the case with othercommitments, home equity loan commitments that a bank: (1) can unconditionallycancel within one year; \7\<NOTE/> and (2) reviews at least annually to determine whether ornot they should be extended, are treated as short-term commitments. Short-termcommitments are deemed to involve low risk and, therefore, are not assesseda capital charge. However, like other long-term commitments, the undrawnportion of long-term home equity lines of credit are converted at 50 percent.The resulting credit equivalent amount is then assigned a 50 percent riskweight if the loan is secured by a first lien or a 100 percent risk weightif it is secured by a junior lien.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ In the case of consumer home equity lines of credit securedby liens on 1-4 family residential property, a bank is deemed able to unconditionallycancel the line for purposes of this criterion if, at its option, the bankcan prohibit additional extensions of credit, reduce the credit line, andterminate the line to the full extent permitted by relevant Federal law.The FDIC has determined that this approach is appropriate in view of thepreferential treatment that the Basle Accord grants home mortgages generallyand in light of the Congressional purposes behind the Home Equity LoanConsumer Protection Act of 1988, which sets forth certain guidelines underwhich lenders may cancel or not make advances on home equity lines.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Mortgage-Backed Securities</ITAG>The Basle Accord does not specifically address certain instruments, suchas mortgage-backed securities and the newly developed stripped mortgage-backedsecurities. Nonetheless, the FDIC has determined that, within the contextof the overall risk-based capital framework, it is appropriate to viewprivately-issued mortgage-backed securities, such as mortgage pass-throughsecurities and collateralized mortgage obligations (CMOs), that meet certaincriteria outlined in the statement of policy as essentially <T3>indirect holdings </T3>of the underlying assets. Accordingly, suchsecurities are generally assigned to the same risk weight appropriate tothe highest risk-weighted asset in the underlying asset pool, except inno case will these securities be assigned to the zero percent risk weightcategory,\8\<NOTE/> which is generally reserved for <T3>direct </T3>claims on OECD-central governments.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ Mortgage-backed securities issued or guaranteed by U.S.Government agencies or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies are generallyassigned to the same risk weight as other claims issued or guaranteed bysuch agencies.Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities that do not meet the specifiedcriteria are assigned to the 100 percent risk weight category. Any classesof a mortgage-backed security that can absorb more than their <T3>pro rata</T3> share of the loss without the whole mortgage-backed securityissue being in default, for example, so-called subordinated classes orresidual interests, are also assigned a 100 percent risk weight regardlessof the issuer or guarantor of the security.Stripped mortgage-backed securities, including interest-only (IOs), principal-only(POs), and similar instruments, possess different structural characteristicsfrom the typical mortgage-backed securities. These differing characteristicsare reflected in the extreme price volatility and market risk associatedwith these instruments. For this reason, the FDIC has decided to assignthese instruments, regardless of issuer or guarantor, to the 100 percentrisk category.G. Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Netting</ITAG>Consistent with the December 1987 Basle Accord, the FDIC's March 1988 proposaldid not recognize netting of interest rate and foreign exchange rate contractsbetween counterparties for the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio. The proposal indicated that this would not be done until the legalissues surrounding the netting of contracts were satisfactorily resolved.Commenters on this issue generally asserted that netting reduces risk andthat, therefore, some form of netting should be recognized. Of those thatfavored a specific netting arrangement, a majority endorsed netting bynovation.\9\<NOTE/> A number of commenters believed that the legal support forcertain types of netting arrangements was stronger than was characterizedin the December 1987 Basle Accord.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ Netting by novation involves a written bilateral contractbetween two counterparties under which any obligation to the other counterpartyto deliver a given currency on a given date is automatically amalgamatedwith all other obligations for the same currency and value date, <T3>legally </T3>substituting one single net amount for the previous grossobligations.The revised July 1988 Basle Accord reflects the determination by the BasleSupervisors' Committee that novated contracts replace in law and in factthe contracts they have extinguished and that novation is the only formof netting legally enforceable at this time under the bankruptcy laws ofall member countries. Accordingly, the FDIC's statement of policy recognizesnetting by novation, but no other forms of netting, for the purpose ofcalculating credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchangerate contracts. The FDIC will continue to work with the Basle Supervisors'Committee to assess the acceptability of various other forms of netting.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Conversion Factor for Long-Term Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts</ITAG>Consistent with the December 1987 Basle Accord, the March 1988 proposalset forth a 5 percent conversion factor for calculating potential futurecredit exposure on foreign exchange rate contracts with a remaining maturityof over one year. U.S. and foreign bank commenters stated their view thatthe conversion factor was too high. They argued that it not only overstatedthe risks associated with such contracts, but also might hurt the competitivenessof banks in this market vis-a-vis other financial firms that are not subjectto the same capital requirements. The Basle Supervisors' Committee decidedagainst reducing this factor in light of the risks relating to the volatilityof foreign exchange rates and because currency swaps, unlike interest rateswaps, involve an exchange of principal on maturity. Accordingly, theseguidelines retain the 5 percent conversion factor for long-term foreignexchange rate contracts.The FDIC notes that while this conversion factor has not been reduced,foreign exchange rate contracts in general receive favorable treatmentunder the Basle framework. While direct extensions of credit to standardrisk obligors are assigned a risk weight of 100 percent, the credit equivalentamounts of foreign exchange rate (and interest rate) contracts involvingsuch obligors are assigned a preferential maximum risk weight of 50 percenton the grounds that most counterparties in those markets are of high creditquality. The FDIC intends to monitor the quality of credits in these marketsand, in the future, might consider assigning a 100 percent risk weightto credit equivalent amounts of foreign exchange and interest rate relatedcontracts if circumstances so warrant.H. Original Versus Remaining MaturityThe FDIC's March 1988 proposal, consistent with the December 1987 BasleAccord, assigned risk weights to claims on foreign banks and credit conversionfactors for off-balance sheet loan commitments based, in part, on their<T3>original</T3> maturity. The action reflected the view that, other thingsbeing equal, the longer the term of a claim or commitment, the greaterthe risk. According to this view, after a long-term claim or commitmenthas been extended, many events can occur to reduce the creditworthinessof the borrower. If such events do occur, the lending institution is subjectto risks greater than those foreseen when the claim or commitment was originallyextended, even if only a short amount of time remains under the facility.U.S. commenters, however, disagreed with this view and overwhelmingly favoredthe use of <T3>remaining</T3> maturity which, they stated, reflects more accuratelythe risk associated with these transactions. Moreover, many of the 35 respondentsthat addressed this issue noted that their internal information systemswere based on remaining maturity, and that maintenance of a separate systembased on original maturity solely for risk-based capital purposes wouldentail substantial costs.Partially in response to these concerns, the revised July 1988 Basle Accordand the FDIC's final statement of policy apply risk weights to claims onforeign banks domiciled in non-OECD countries based on their <T3>remaining,</T3> rather than original, maturity. The Basle Supervisors'Committee remained of the belief, however, that the use of remaining maturitywas inappropriate for commitments. Consequently, the revised Basle Accordbases the credit conversion factors that apply to loan commitments on their<T3>original</T3> maturity, but allows banks to use <T3>remaining</T3> maturity until year-end 1992. The FDIC's statement ofpolicy also provides for this transition rule so that those banks thatcurrently track loan commitments according to their remaining, rather thanoriginal, maturity will have sufficient time to adjust their internal informationsystems.I. Average Versus Period-End DataThe FDIC's March 1988 proposal requested comment on whether the calculationof the risk-based ratio should be based on average or period-end data.Of the 33 comments received on this issue, about one-half favored the useof period-end figures, one-fourth supported the use of average figures,and the other fourth contended that average figures should be used formost balance sheet assets with period-end figures used for off-balancesheet items. Commenters, in theory, generally agreed that the use of averagedata would be more meaningful and less misleading than period-end figures.On the other hand, many of the same respondents cited the cost and impracticalityof generating average data for all assets and off-balance sheet items.In an effort to minimize the burden associated with the risk-based capitalframework, the FDIC had decided to allow banks to use period-end data incalculating the risk-based capital ratio. However, on a case-by-case basis,banks may also be required to calculate risk-based capital ratios usingaverage balances if supervisory concerns render it appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Application of the Framework</ITAG>A. The Impact on Existing Capital to Asset (Leverage) RatiosThe Basle framework and the FDIC's final statement of policy provide for:(1) a transition period through the end of 1992 during which minimum risk-basedcapital standards will be phased into the existing supervisory system,and (2) an interim minimum supervisory ratio of capital to risk-weightedassets that becomes effective at the end of 1990. As set forth in the FDIC'sMarch 1988 proposal, the existing primary and total capital to <T3>total assets</T3> ratios (leverage ratios) will be retained at leastuntil the initial minimum risk-based capital ratio takes effect at theend of 1990.Of the 17 comments received on this issue, nearly three-fourths of therespondents favored abandoning the existing leverage ratios because theircontinued use could be confusing and would be unnecessary in light of therisk-based framework. However, several commenters advocated retaining theleverage ratios out of concern that the risk-based standard was too lenient;others argued that continued application of a leverage standard was appropriateuntil greater experience is gained with the risk-based ratio.The FDIC believes that retention of the existing leverage ratios, or somemodified form of these ratios, is desirable in order to maintain some constrainton a banks' overall leverage. Retention of an overall leverage constraintis important since, in the absence of such a constraint and without a comprehensivemeasure for interest rate risk, the assignment of a significant volumeof assets to the zero percent or other lower risk categories under therisk-based capital framework could allow a bank to assume an unwarranteddegree of leveraging and risk-taking. In light of these concerns, the Federalbanking agencies have been working toward a common leverage guideline.In the interim, the continued use of the existing leverage ratios willprovide an element of continuity as transition is made to a risk-basedframework.The FDIC and the other Federal banking agencies recognize that differentcapital definitions for leverage and risk-based capital purposes carrythe potential for confusion and perhaps an element of undue burden. Asa result, the FDIC expects to propose a revised leverage constraint thatwould replace the existing leverage ratios by year-end 1990. It is contemplatedthat the definition of capital under such a revised leverage constraintwould be consistent with the definition of capital used for risk-basedcapital purposes and that the minimum ratio under the revised leveragestandard would be set at a level consistent with the current minimum totalcapital-to-total assets standard.B. Application of Risk-Based Framework to Small BanksThe Basle Accord applies only to internationally active banks, but it recognizesthat each national supervisory authority may wish to apply the frameworkto a broader class of commercial banking organizations. The FDIC believesthat the risk-based capital framework should apply to all banks on a consolidatedbasis on the grounds that the principle of assessing capital adequacy againstbroad levels of risk exposure is relevant to all banks, regardless of size.Nonetheless, the Federal banking agencies recognize that, to a large extent,the impact of the framework will fall predominantly on large banking organizationsand on those banks with significant off-balance sheet exposures. Accordingly,the agencies solicited public comment on several options regarding theappropriate focus of offsite supervisory data collection and monitoringefforts. These options included focusing data collection and monitoringefforts on either all banks, large banks, or institutions with significantoff-balance sheet activities.Of the 38 comments received on this issue, nearly two-thirds of the respondentsrecommended that supervisory data collection and monitoring efforts focuson organizations above some asset size. This consensus reflected concernabout the reporting burden that the proposed capital guidelines could placeon small banks. Many of these respondents favored the use of an asset sizethreshold of either $500 million or $1 billion, with the reporting burdenkept to a minimum for all banks below the threshold. Of the other one-thirdof the respondents, most favored the application of the framework to <T3>all</T3> depository institutions, including savings and loan associationsand credit unions.The FDIC continues to believe that the minimum risk-based capital ratioshould apply to <T3>all</T3> banks, since all banks can hold low-risk, as well as high-risk,assets and all banks may engage in off-balance sheet activities. Moreover,this approach helps avoid the appearance of a dual standard for large andsmall institutions. However, the FDIC also believes that any additionalreporting requirements arising from the risk-based framework should beheld to a minimum for small banks. The FDIC, together with the other Federalbanking agencies, intends to be guided by this principle in developingreporting forms that will allow for the monitoring of compliance with therisk-based capital standards while minimizing the reporting burden on thesmaller institutions.C. Treatment of Investments in SubsidiariesThe FDIC's risk-based capital framework generally provides for the consolidationof subsidiaries when calculating the risk-based capital ratio, but theframework also is intended to accommodate functional regulation and theexpansion of bank powers. To accomplish this latter objective, the statementof policy allows the FDIC to deduct investments in certain subsidiariesfrom the parent bank's capital and to exclude the assets of these subsidiariesfrom the parent's consolidated assets, for example, in situations wherestrong firewalls, adequate nonbank capital, and any other protections theFDIC deems necessary are first put in place to safeguard the parent bank.This treatment ensures that the parent bank maintains a level of capital,exclusive of the resources invested in such subsidiaries, that is sufficientto support its banking activities. By way of example, the statement ofpolicy provides that investments by a state nonmember bank in securitiessubsidiaries established pursuant to 12 CFR 337.4 are to be deducted froma bank's capital for purposes of calculating the risk-based capital ratio.The statement of policy also provides that investments in unconsolidatedbanking and finance subsidiaries_that is, any subsidiaries that are primarilyengaged in banking or finance but for which the parent bank does not consolidatethe subsidiaries for regulatory capital purposes_are also to be deductedfrom the bank's capital. Thus, the risk-based capital framework specificallyallows for the exclusion of the parent bank's investments in, and the assetsof, designated subsidiaries from the calculation of the state nonmemberbank's capital ratio. For risk-based capital purposes, aggregate capitalinvestments in these unconsolidated subsidiaries (that is, the sum of anyequity or debt capital investments and other instruments or commitmentsthat are deemed to be capital of the subsidiary) will be deducted fromthe parent bank's total capital base. Advances (that is, loans, extensionsof credit, guarantees, commitments, or any other forms of credit exposure)to such subsidiaries that are not deemed to be capital will generally notbe deducted from capital. Rather, such investments will normally be includedin the parent bank's consolidated assets and assigned to the 100 percentrisk category, unless such obligations are backed by recognized collateralor guarantees, in which case they will be assigned to the risk categoryappropriate to such collateral or guarantees. These other extensions ofcredit may, however, be deducted from the parent bank's capital if, inthe judgment of the FDIC, the risks stemming from such advances are comparableto the risks associated with capital investments, or if the advances involveother risk factors that warrant such an adjustment to capital for supervisorypurposes.Although investments in certain subsidiaries, such as those representinga majority ownership in another Federally-insured depository institution,are not consolidated for purposes of the consolidated Reports of Conditionand Income that are filed by the parent bank, they are generally consolidatedfor purposes of determining regulatory capital requirements under the FDIC'sexisting Part 325 capital maintenance regulation. Therefore, investmentsin depository institution subsidiaries generally will not be deducted forrisk-based capital purposes; rather, the assets and liabilities of suchsubsidiaries will be consolidated with those of the parent bank when calculatingthe risk-based capital ratio.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act Analysis</ITAG>The FDIC certifies that adoption of this statement of policy will not havea significant economic impact on a substantial number of small businessentities, in this case small state nonmember banks, in accord with thespirit and purposes of the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) While all insured banks will presumably be required tomake some revisions to their reporting procedures to permit supervisorymonitoring of risk-based capital ratios, the FDIC, in conjunction withthe other Federal banking agencies, intends to adopt, after an opportunityfor public comment, reporting procedures designed to minimize the burdenon small institutions.The risk-based capital framework set forth in this statement of policyis designed primarily to take accout of those practices, such as the increaseduse of off-balance sheet activities and the decline in the holdings oflow-risk, liquid assets, which have been engaged in primarily by certainlarger banking organizations. Moreover, rather than requiring all banksto raise additional capital, the statement of policy is directed at institutionswhose capital positions are less than fully adequate in relation to theirrisk profiles.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Part 325</ITAG>Bank deposit insurance, Banks, banking, Capital adequacy, State nonmemberbanks.Accordingly, 12 CFR Part 325 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 325_CAPITAL MAINTENANCE</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 325 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 12 U.S.C. 1815(a), 1818(b), 1816, 1818(a), 1815(b),1819(Tenth), 1828(c), 1828(d), 1828(i), 3907, 3909.</ITAG>2. A new Appendix A is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Part 325_Statement of Policy on Risk-Based Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Capital adequacy is one of the critical factors that the FDIC is requiredto analyze when taking action on various types of applications and whenconducting supervisory activities related to the safety and soundness ofindividual banks and the banking system. In view of this, the FDIC's Boardof Directors has adopted Part 325 of its regulations, which sets forth(1) minimum standards of capital adequacy for insured state nonmember banksand (2) standards for determining when an insured bank is in an unsafeor unsound condition by reason of the amount of its capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This capital maintenance regulation was designed to establish, inconjunction with other Federal bank regulatory agencies, uniform capitalstandards for all federally-regulated banking organizations, regardlessof size. The uniform capital standards were based on ratios of capitalto total assets. While those leverage ratios have served as a useful toolfor assessing capital adequacy, the FDIC believes there is a need for acapital measure that is more explicitly and systematically sensitive tothe risk profiles of individual banks. As a result, the FDIC's Board ofDirectors has adopted this Statement of Policy on Risk-Based Capital tosupplement the Part 325 regulation. This statement of policy does not replaceor eliminate the existing Part 325 capital-to-total assets leverage ratios.Once the risk-based capital framework is implemented, the FDIC will considerwhether the Part 325 definitions of capital for leverage purposes and theminimum leverage ratios should be amended.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The framework set forth in this statement of policy consists of (1)a <T3>definition of capital</T3> for risk-based capital purposes, (2) a systemfor calculating <T3>risk-weighted assets</T3> by assigning assets and off-balance sheetitems to broad risk categories, and (3) a schedule, which includes transitionalarrangements during a phase-in period, for achieving a <T3>minimum supervisory ratio</T3> of capital to risk weighted assets.A bank's risk-based capital ratio is calculated by dividing its qualifyingtotal capital base (the numerator of the ratio) by its risk-weighted assets(the denominator).\1\<NOTE/> Table I outlines the definition of capital and provides ageneral explanation of how the risk-based capital ratio is calculated,Table II summarizes the risk weights and risk categories, and Table IIIsets forth the credit conversation factors for off-balance sheet items.Additional explanations of the capital definitions, the risk-weighted assetcalculations, and the minimum risk-based capital ratio guidelines are providedin Sections I, II and III of this statement of policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\Period-end amounts, rather than average balances, normallywill be used when calculating risk-based capital ratios. However, on acase-by-case basis, ratios based on average balances may also be requiredif supervisory concerns render it appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="21">This statement of policy applies to all <T3>FDIC-insured state-chartered banks</T3> (excluding insured branchesof foreign banks) that are <T3>not</T3> members of the Federal Reserve System, hereafter referredto as ``state nonmember banks,'' regardless of size, and to all circumstancesin which the FDIC is required to evaluate the capital of a banking organization.Therefore, the risk-based capital framework set forth in this statementof policy will be used in the examination and supervisory process as wellas in the analysis of applications that the FDIC is required to act upon.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital ratio focuses principally on broad categoriesof credit risk; however, the ratio does not take account of many otherfactors that can affect a bank's financial condition. These factors includeoverall interest rate risk exposure; liquidity, funding and market risks;the quality and level of earnings; investment or loan portfolio concentrations;the quality of loans and investments; the effectiveness of loan and investmentpolicies; and management's overall ability to monitor and control financialand operating risks. In addition to evaluating capital ratios, an overallassessment of capital adequacy must take account of each of these otherfactors, including, in particular, the level and severity of problem andadversely classified assets. For this reason, the final supervisory judgmenton a bank's capital adequacy may differ significantly from the conclusionsthat might be drawn soley from the absolute level of the bank's risk-basedcapital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In light of these other considerations, banks generally are expectedto operate above the minimum risk-based capital ratio. Banks contemplatingsignificant expansion plans, as well as those institutions with high orinordinate levels of risk, should hold capital commensurate with the leveland nature of the risks to which they are exposed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">I. Definition of Capital for the Risk-Based Capital Ratio</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A bank's qualifying total capital base consists of two types of capitalelements: ``core capital elements'' (Tier 1) and ``supplementary capitalelements'' (Tier 2). To qualify as an element of Tier 1 or Tier 2 capital,a capital instrument should not contain or be subject to any conditions,covenants, terms, restrictions, or provisions that are inconsistent withsafe and sound banking practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">A. The Components of Qualifying Capital (see Table I)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Core capital elements (Tier 1)</T3> consists of:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">_Common stockholders' equity capital (includes common stock and anyrelated surplus, undivided profits, disclosed capital reserves that representa segregation of undivided profits, and foreign currency translation adjustments;less net unrealized losses on marketable equity securities):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">_Noncumulative perpetual preferred stock,\2\<NOTE/> including any related surplus; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\Preferred stock issues where the dividend is reset periodicallybased, in whole or in part, upon the bank's current credit standing, includingbut not limited to, auction rate, money market or remarketable preferredstock, are assigned to Tier 2 capital, regardless of whether the dividendsare cumulative or noncumulative.<ITAG tagnum="25">_Minority interests in the equity capital accounts of consolidatedsubsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">At least 50 percent of the qualifying total capital base should consistof Tier 1 capital. <T3>Core (Tier 1) capital</T3> is defined as the sum of core capital elements\3\<NOTE/> minus all intangible assets other than mortgage servicingrights.\4\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\In addition to the core capital elements, Tier 1 may alsoinclude certain supplementary capital elements during the transition periodsubject to certain limitations set forth in Section III of this statementof policy.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\An exception is allowed for intangible assets that areexplicitly approved by the FDIC as part of the bank's regulatory capitalon a specific case basis. These intangibles will be included in capitalfor risk-based capital purposes under the terms and conditions that arespecifically approved by the FDIC.<ITAG tagnum="21">Although nonvoting common stock noncumulative perpetual preferredstock, and minority interests in the equity capital accounts of consolidatedsubsidiaries are normally included in Tier 1 capital, voting common stockholders'equity generally will be expected to be the dominant form of Tier 1 capital.Thus, banks should avoid undue reliance on nonvoting equity, preferredstock and minority interests.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Although minority interests in consolidated subsidiaries are generallyincluded in regulatory capital, exceptions to this general rule will bemade if the minority interests fail to provide meaningful capital supportto the consolidated bank. Such a situation could arise if the minorityinterests are entitled to a preferred claim on essentially low risk assetsof the subsidiary. Similarly, although intangible assets in the form ofmortgage servicing rights are generally recognized for risk-based capitalpurposes, the deduction of part or all of the mortgage servicing rightsmay be required if the carrying amounts of these rights are excessive inrelation to their market value or the level of the bank's capital accounts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Supplementary capital elements (Tier 2) </T3>consist of:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_Allowances for loan and lease losses, up to a maximum of 1.25 percentof risk-weighted assets;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_Cumulative perpetual preferred stock, long-term preferred stock (originalmaturity of at least 20 years) and any related surplus;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_Perpetual preferred stock (and any related surplus) where the dividendis reset periodically based, in whole or part, on the bank's current creditstanding, regardless of whether the dividends are cumulative or noncumulative;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_Hybrid capital instruments, including mandatory convertible debtsecurities; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock (originalaverage maturity of five years or more) and any related surplus.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The definition of supplementary capital does <T3>not </T3>include revaluation reserves or hidden reserves that representunrealized appreciation on assets such as bank premises and equity securities.Although such reserves will not be explicitly recognized when calculatinga bank's risk-based capital ratio, these reserves may be taken into accountas additional factors when assessing a bank's overall capital adequacy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The maximum amount of Tier 2 capital that may be recognized for risk-basedcapital purposes is limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital (after anydeductions for disallowed intangibles). In addition, the combined amountof term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock that maybe treated as part of Tier 2 capital for risk-based capital purposes islimited to 50 percent of Tier 1 capital. Amounts in excess of these limitsmay be issued but are not included in the calculation of the risk-basedcapital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Allowance for loan and lease losses. </T3>Allowances for loan and leaselosses are reserves that have been established through a charge againstearnings to absorb future losses on loans or lease financing receivables.Allowances for loan and lease losses exclude ``allocated transfer riskreserves,'' \5\<NOTE/> and reserves created against identified losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Allocated transfer risk reserves are reserves that havebeen established in accordance with Section 905(a) of the InternationalLending Supervision Act of 1983 against certain assets whose value hasbeen found by the U.S. supervisory authorities to have been significantlyimpaired by protracted transfer risk problems.<ITAG tagnum="21">This risk-based capital framework provides a phasedown during thetransition period of the extent to which the allowance for loan and leaselosses may be included in an institution's capital base. By year-end 1990,the allowance for loan and lease losses, as an element of supplementarycapital, may constitute no more than 1.5 percent of risk-weighted assetsand, by year-end 1992, no more than 1.25 percent of risk-weighted assets.\6\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ The amount of the allowance for loan and lease lossesthat may be included as a supplementary capital element is based on a percentageof gross risk-weighted assets. A bank may deduct reserves for loan andlease losses that are in excess of the amount permitted to be includedin capital, as well as allocated transfer risk reserves, from gross risk-weightedassets when computing the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.<ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Preferred stock. </T3>Perpetual preferred stock is defined as preferredstock that does not have a maturity date, that cannot be redeemed at theoption of the holder, and that has no other provisions that will requirefuture redemption of the issue. Long-term preferred stock includes limited-lifepreferred stock with an original maturity of 20 years or more, providedthat the stock cannot be redeemed at the option of the holder prior tomaturity, except with the prior approval of the FDIC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Cumulative perpetual preferred stock and long-term preferred stockqualify for inclusion in supplementary capital provided that the instrumentscan absorb losses while the issuer operates as a going concern (a fundamentalcharacteristic of equity capital) and provided the issuer has the optionto defer payment of dividends on these instruments. Given these conditions,and the perpetual or long-term nature of the intruments, there is no limiton the amount of these preferred stock instruments that may be includedwith Tier 2 capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Noncumulative perpetual preferred stock where the dividend is resetperiodically based, in whole or in part, on the bank's current credit standing,including auction rate, money market, or remarketable preferred stock,are also assigned to Tier 2 capital without limit, provided the above conditionsare met.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Hybrid capital instruments. </T3>Hybrid capital instruments includeinstruments that have certain characteristics of both debt and equity.In order to be included as supplementary capital elements, these instrumentsshould meet the following criteria:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The instrument should be unsecured, subordinated to the claimsof depositors and general creditors, and fully paid-up.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The instrument should not be redeemable at the option of the holderprior to maturity, except with the prior approval of the FDIC. This requirementimplies that holders of such instruments may not accelerate the paymentof principal except in the event of bankruptcy, insolvency, or reorganization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The instrument should be available to participate in losses whilethe issuer is operating as a going concern. (Term subordinated debt wouldnot meet this requirement.) To satisfy this requirement, the instrumentshould convert to common or perpetual preferred stock in the event thatthe sum of the undivided profits and capital surplus accounts of the issuerresults in a negative balance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The instrument should provide the option for the issuer to deferprincipal and interest payments if: (a) the issuer does not report a profitin the preceding annual period, defined as combined profits (i.e., netincome) for the most recent four quarters, <T3>and </T3>(b) the issuer eliminates cash dividends on its common andpreferred stock. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Mandatory convertible debt securities that meet the criteria set forthin 12 CFR 325.2(e) will qualify as hybrid capital instruments. There isno limit on the amount of hybrid capital instruments that may be includedwithin Tier 2 capital. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock. </T3>Theaggregate amount of term subordinated debt (excluding mandatory convertibledebt securities) and intermediate-term preferred stock (including any relatedsurplus) that may be treated as Tier 2 capital for risk-based capital purposesis limited to 50 percent of Tier 1 capital. Term subordinated debt andintermediate-term preferred stock should have an original average maturityof at least five years to qualify as supplementary capital and should notbe redeemable at the option of the holder prior to maturity, except withthe prior approval of the FDIC. To qualify as supplementary capital, termsubordinated debt instruments issued by state nonmember banks should meetthe criteria for subordinated debt set forth in 12 CFR 325.2(j), exceptthat the minimum original maturity requirement is five years for risk-basedcapital purposes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Discount of limited-life supplementary capital instruments. </T3>Asa limited-life capital instrument approaches maturity, the instrument beginsto take on charcteristics of a short-term obligation and becomes less likea component of capital. Therefore, for risk-based capital purposes, theoutstanding amount of term subordinated debt and limited-life preferredstock eligible for inclusion in capital will be adjusted downward, or discounted,as the instruments approach maturity. Each limited-life capital instrumentwill be discounted by reducing the outstanding amount of the capital instrumenteligible for inclusion as supplementary capital by a fifth of the originalamount (less redemptions) each year during the instrument's last five yearsbefore maturity. Such instruments, therefore, will have no capital valuewhen they have a remaining maturity of less than a year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B. Deductions from Capital and Other Adjustments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Certain assets are deducted from a bank's capital base for the purposeof calculating the numerator of the risk-based capital ratio.\7\<NOTE/> These assets include:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ Any assets deducted from capital when computing the numeratorof the risk-based capital ratio will also be excluded from risk-weightedassets when computing the denominator of the ratio. <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) All <T3>intangible assets </T3>other than mortgage servicing rights.\8\<NOTE/> These disallowed intangibles are deducted from the core capital(Tier 1) elements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ In addition to mortgage servicing rights, certain otherintangibles may be allowed if explicitly approved by the FDIC as part ofthe bank's regulatory capital on a specific case basis. In evaluating whetherother types of intangles should be recognized for regulatory capital purposeson a specific case basis, the FDIC will accord special attention to thegeneral characteristics of the intangibles, including: (1) the separabilityof the intangible asset and the ability to sell it separate and apart fromthe bank or the bulk of the bank's assets, (2) the certainty that a readilyidentifiable stream of cash flows associated with the intangible assetcan hold its value notwithstanding the future prospects of the bank, and(3) the existence of a market of sufficient depth to provide liquidityfor the intangible asset. <ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Investments in <T3>unconsolidated </T3>banking and finance subsidiaries.\9\<NOTE/> This includes any equity or debt capital investments in bankingor finance subsidaries if the subsidiaries are not consolidated for regulatorycapital requirements.\10\<NOTE/> Generally, these investments include equity and debt capitalsecurities and any other instruments or commitments that are deemed tobe capital of the subsidiary. These investments are deducted from the bank'stotal (Tier 1 plus Tier 2) capital base.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ For risk-based capital purposes, these subsidiaries aregenerally defined as any company that is primarily engaged in banking orfinance and in which the bank, either directly or indirectly, owns morethan 50 percent of the outstanding voting stock but does not consolidatethe company for regulatory capital purposes. In addition to investmentsin unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiaries, the FDIC may, on acase-by-case basis, deduct investments in associated companies or jointventures, which are generally defined as any companies in which the bank,either directly or indirectly, owns 20 to 50 percent of the outstandingvoting stock. Alternatively, the FDIC may, in certain cases, apply an appropriaterisk-weighted capital charge against a bank's proportionate interest inthe assets of associated companies and joint ventures. The definitionsfor subsidiaries, associated companies and joint ventures are containedin the instructions for the preparation of the Consolidated Reports ofCondition and Income.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ Consolidation requirements for regulatory capital purposesgenerally follow the consolidation requirements set forth in the instructionsfor preparation of the consolidated Reports of Condition and Income. However,although investments in subsidiaries representing majority ownership inanother Federally-insured depository institution are not consolidated forpurposes of the consolidated Reports of Condition and Income that are filedby the parent bank, they are generally consolidated for purposes of determiningFDIC regulatory capital requirements. Therefore, investments in these depositoryinstitution subsidiaries generally will not be deducted for risk-basedcapital purposes; rather, assets and liabilities of such subsidiaries willbe consolidated with those of the parent bank when calculating the risk-basedcapital ratio. In addition, although securities subsidiaries establishedpursuant to 12 CFR 337.4 are consolidated for Report of Condition and Incomepurposes, they are not consolidated for regulatory capital purposes. <ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Investments in <T3>securities subsidiaries </T3>established pursuant to 12 CFR 337.4.The FDIC may also consider deducting investments in other subsidiaries,either on a case-by-case basis or, as with securities subsidiaries, basedon the general characteristics or functional nature of the subsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Reciprocal holdings </T3>of capital instruments of banks that representintentional cross-holdings by the banks. These holdings are deducted fromthe bank's total capital base. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">On a case-by-case basis, and in conjunction with supervisory examinations,other deductions from capital may also be required, including any adjustmentsdeemed appropriate for assets classified as loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">II. Procedures For Computing Risk-Weighted Assets</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">A. General Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under the risk-based capital framework, a bank's balance sheet assetsand credit equivalent amounts of off-balance sheet items are assigned toone of four broad risk categories according to the obligor or, if relevent,the guarantor or the nature of the collateral. The aggregate dollar amountin each category is then multiplied by the risk weight assigned to thatcategory. The resulting weighted values from each of the four risk categoriesare added together and this sum is the <T3>risk-weighted assets </T3>total that, as adjusted.\11\<NOTE/> comprises the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ Any asset deducted from a bank's capital accounts whencomputing the numerator of the risk-based capital ratio will also be excludedfrom risk-weighted assets when calculating the denominator for the ratio.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-weighted amounts for all off-balance sheet items are determinedby a two-step process. First, the notional principal, or face value, amountof each off-balance sheet item generally is multiplied by a credit conversionfactor to arrive at a balance sheet ``credit equivalent amount.'' Second,the credit equivalent amount generally is assigned to the appropriate riskcategory, like any balance sheet asset, according to the obligor or, ifrelevant, the guarantor or the nature of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B. Other Considerations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Indirect Holdings of Assets_</T3>Some of the assets on a bank's balancesheet may represent an indirect holding of a pool of assets; for example,<T3>mutual funds. </T3>An investment in shares of a mutual fund whose portfolioconsists solely of various securities or money market instruments that,if held separately, would be assigned to different risk categories, generallyis assigned to the risk category appropriate to the highest risk-weightedasset that the fund is permitted to hold in accordance with its statedinvestment objectives, but in no case to the zero percent risk category.If, in order to maintain a necessary degree of liquidity, a fund is permittedto hold an insignificant amount of its investments in short-term, highlyliquid assets that are of superior credit quality but that do not qualifyfor a preferential risk weight, such assets may generally be disregardedin determining the risk category into which the bank's holding in the overallfund should be assigned. Regardless of the composition of the fund's assets,if the fund is allowed to engage in any activities that appear speculativein nature (for example, use of futures, forwards, or option contracts forpurposes other than to reduce interest rate risk) or if the fund has anyother characteristics that are inconsistent with the preferential risk-weightingassigned to the fund's assets, holdings in the fund will be assigned tothe 100 percent risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Collateral_</T3>In determining risk weights of various assets, theonly forms of collateral that are formally recognized by the risk-basedcapital framework are cash on deposit in the lending bank; securities issuedor guaranteed by the central governments of the OECD-based group of countries,\1\\2\<NOTE/> U.S. Government agencies, or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies;and securities issued or guaranteed by multilateral lending institutionsor regional development banks. Claims fully secured by such collateralare assigned to the 20 percent risk category. The extent to which thesesecurities are recognized as collateral for risk-based capital purposesis determined by their current market value. If a claim is partially secured,the portion of the claim that is not covered by the collateral is assignedto the risk category appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant, the guarantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\2\ The OECD-based group of countries comprises all fullmembers of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD),as well as countries that have concluded special lending arrangements withthe International Monetary Fund (IMF) associated with the Fund's GeneralArrangements to Borrow. The OECD includes the following countries: Australia,Austria, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, the Federal Republic of Germany, Finland,France, Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, the Netherlands,New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, theUnited Kingdom and the United States. Saudi Arabia has concluded speciallending arrangements with the IMF associated with the Fund's General Arrangementsto Borrow.<ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Guarantees_</T3>Guarantees of the OECD and non-OECD central governments,U.S. Government agencies, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies, state andlocal governments of the OECD-based group of countries, multilateral lendinginstitutions and regional development banks, U.S. depository institutionsand foreign banks are also recognized. If a claim is partially guaranteed,the portion of the claim that is not fully covered by the guarantee isassigned to the risk category appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant,the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Maturity_</T3>Maturity is generally not a factor in assigning itemsto risk categories with the exceptions of claims on non-OECD banks, commitments,and interest rate and foreign exchange rate related contracts. Except forcommitments, short-term is defined as one year or less <T3>remaining </T3>maturity and long-term is defined as over one year <T3>remaining </T3>maturity. In the case of commitments, short-term isdefined as one year or less <T3>original</T3> maturity and long-term is defined as over one year originalmaturity.\1\\3\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\3\ Through year-end 1992, remaining rather than originalmaturity may be used for determining term to maturity for commitments.<ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Mortgage-Backed Securities_</T3>Mortgage-backed securities, includingpass-throughs and collateralized mortgage obligations (but not strippedmortgage-backed securities) that are issued or guaranteed by a U.S. Governmentagency or a U.S. Government-sponsored agency, normally are assigned tothe risk weight category appropriate to the issuer or guarantor. Generally,a privately-issued mortgage-backed security is treated as essentially anindirect holding of the underlying assets, and assigned to the same riskcategory as the underlying assets, in accordance with the provisions andcriteria spelled out in detail in the accompanying footnote; \1\\4\<NOTE/> however, such privately-issued mortgage-backed securitiesmay not be assigned to the zero percent risk category. Privately-issuedmortgage-backed securities whose structures do not comply with the specifiedprovisions set forth in the footnote are assigned to the 100 percent riskcategory. In addition, any class of a mortgage-backed security that canabsorb more than its <T3>pro rata</T3> share of loss without the whole issue being in default(for example, a subordinated class or residual interest) will also be assignedto the 100 percent risk weight category. All stripped mortgage-backed securities,including interest-only strips (IOs), principal-only strips (POs), andsimilar instruments, are assigned to the 100 percent risk weight category,regardless of the issuer or guarantor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\4\ A privately-issued mortgage-backed security may betreated as an indirect holding of the underlying assets provided that (1)the underlying assets are held by an independent trustee and the trusteehas a first priority, perfected security interest in the underlying assetson behalf of the holders of the security, (2) either the holder of thesecurity has an undivided <T3>pro rata </T3>ownership interest in the underlying mortgage assetsor the trust or single purpose entity (or conduit) that issues the securityhas no liabilities unrelated to the issued securities, (3) the securityis structured such that the cash flow from the underlying assets in allcases fully meets the cash flow requirements of the security without unduereliance on any reinvestment income, and (4) there is no material reinvestmentrisk associated with any funds awaiting distribution to the holders ofthe security. In addition, if the underlying assets of a mortgage-backedsecurity are composed of more than one type of asset, the entire mortgage-backedsecurity is generally assigned to the category appropriate to the highestrisk-weighted asset underlying the issue.<ITAG tagnum="73">C. Risk Weights for Balance Sheet Assets (see Table II)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital framework contains four risk weight categories_0percent, 20 percent, 50 percent and 100 percent. In general, if a particularitem can be placed in more than one risk category, it is assigned to thecategory that has the lowest risk weight. An explanation of the componentsof each category follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Category 1_Zero Percent Risk Weight.</T3> This category includes cash(domestic and foreign) owned and held in all offices of the bank or intransit; balances due from Federal Reserve Banks and central banks in otherOECD countries; local currency claims on or guaranteed by non-OECD centralgovernments to the extent that the bank has liabilities booked in thatcurrency; and gold bullion held in the bank's own vaults or in anotherbank's vaults on an allocated basis, to the extent it is offset by goldbullion liabilities.\1\\5\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\5\ All other bullion holdings are to be assigned to the100 percent risk weight category.<ITAG tagnum="21">The zero percent risk category also includes direct claims \1\\6\<NOTE/> (including securities, loans, and leases) on, and the portionsof claims that are unconditionally guaranteed by, OECD central governments\1\\7\<NOTE/> and U.S. Government agencies.\1\\8\<NOTE/> Federal Reserve Bank stock also is included in this category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\6\ For purposes of determining the appropriate risk weightsfor this risk-based capital framework, the terms ``claims'' and ``securities''refer to loans or other <T3>debt </T3>obligations of the entity on whom the claim is held. Investmentsin the form of stock or equity holdings in commercial or financial firmsare generally assigned to the 100 percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\7\ A central government is defined to include departmentsand ministries, including the central bank, of the central government.The U.S. central bank includes the 12 Federal Reserve Banks. The definitionof central government does not include state, provincial or local governmentsor commercial enterprises owned by the central government. In addition,it does not include local government entities or commercial enterpriseswhose obligations are guaranteed by the central government. OECD centralgovernments are defined as central governments of the OECD-based groupof countries. Non-OECD central governments are defined as central governmentsof countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\8\ For risk-based capital purposes U.S. Government agencyis defined as an instrumentality of the U.S. Government whose debt obligationsare fully and explicitly guaranteed as to the timely payment of principaland interest by the full faith and credit of the U.S. Government. Theseagencies include the Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA), theVeterans Administration (VA), the Federal Housing Administration (FHA),the Farmers Home Administration (FHA), the Export-Import Bank (Exim Bank),the Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC), the Commodity CreditCorporation (CCC), and the Small Business Administration (SBA). U.S. Governmentagencies generally do not directly issue securities to the public; however,a number of U.S. Government agencies, such as GNMA, guarantee securitiesthat are publicly held.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Category 2_20 Percent Risk Weight</T3>. This category includes short-termclaims (including demand deposits) on, and portions of short-term claimsthat are guaranteed \1\\9\<NOTE/> by, U.S. depository institutions \2\\0\<NOTE/> and foreign banks;\2\\1\<NOTE/> portions of claims collateralized by cash held in a segregateddeposit account of the lending bank; cash items in process of collection,both foreign and domestic; and long-term claims on, and portions of long-termclaims guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks.\2\\2\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\9\ Claims guaranteed by U.S. depository institutions andforeign banks include risk participations in both bankers acceptances andstandby letters of credit, as well as participations in commitments, thatare <T3>conveyed </T3>to other U.S. depository institutions or foreign banks.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\0\ U.S. depository institutions are defined to includebranches (foreign and domestic) of federally-insured banks and depositoryinstitutions chartered and headquartered in the 50 states of the UnitedStates, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and U.S. territories andpossessions. The definition encompasses banks, mutual or stock savingsbanks, savings or building and loan associations, cooperative banks, creditunions, international banking facilities of domestic depository institutions,and U.S.-chartered depository institutions owned by foreigners. However,this definition excludes branches and agencies of foreign banks locatedin the U.S. and bank holding companies.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\1\ Foreign banks are distinguished as either OECD banksor non-OECD banks. OECD banks include banks and their branches (foreignand domestic) organized under the laws of countries (other than the U.S.)that belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Non-OECD banks includebanks and their branches (foreign and domestic) organized under the lawsof countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Forrisk-based capital purposes, a bank is defined as an institution that engagesin the business of banking; is recognized as a bank by the bank supervisoryor monetary authorities of the country of its organization or principalbanking operations; receives deposits to a substantial extent in the regularcourse of business; and has the power to accept demand deposits. Claimson, or guaranteed by, a non-OECD central bank are treated as claims ona non-OECD bank, except for local currency claims on or guaranteed by anon-OECD central bank that are funded in local currency liabilities. Thelatter claims are assigned to the zero percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\2\ Long-term claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD banksand all claims on bank holding companies are assigned to the 100 percentrisk weight category, as are holdings of bank-issued securities that qualifyas capital of the issuing banks for risk-based capital purposes. <ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes claims on, or portions of claims guaranteedby, U.S. Government-<T3>sponsored </T3>agencies;\2\\3\<NOTE/> and portions of claims (including repurchase agreements)collateralized by securities issued or guaranteed by OECD central governments,U.S. Government agencies, or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies. Also includedin the 20 percent risk category are portions of claims that are conditionallyguaranteed by OECD central governments and U.S. Government agencies.\2\\4\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\3\ For risk-based capital purposes, U.S. Government-sponsoredagencies are defined as agencies originally established or chartered bythe U.S. Government to serve public purposes specified by the U.S. Congressbut whose debt obligations are <T3>not explicitly </T3>guaranteed by the full faith and credit of theU.S. Government. These agencies include the Federal Home Loan MortgageCorporation (FHLMC), the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA),the Farm Credit System, the Federal Home Loan Bank System, and the StudentLoan Marketing Association (SLMA). For risk-based capital purposes, claimson U.S. Government-sponsored agencies also include capital stock in a FederalHome Loan Bank that is held as a condition of membership in that Bank.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\4\ For risk-based capital purposes, a conditional guaranteeis deemed to exist if the validity of the guarantee by the OECD centralgovernment or the U.S. Government agency is dependent upon some affirmativeaction (e.g., servicing requirements on the part of the beneficiary ofthe guarantee). Portions of claims that are unconditionally guaranteedby OECD central governments or U.S. Government agencies are assigned tothe zero percent risk category. <ITAG tagnum="21">General obligation claims on, or portions of claims guaranteed by,the full faith and credit of states or other political subdivisions ofthe United States or other countries of the OECD-based group are also assignedto this 20 percent risk category.\2\\5\<NOTE/> In addition, this category includes claims on the InternationalBank for Reconstruction and Development (World Bank), the Inter-AmericanDevelopment Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the African Development Bank,the European Investment Bank, and other multilateral lending institutionsor regional development institutions in which the U.S. Government is ashareholder or contributing member, as well as portions of claims guaranteedby such organizations or collateralized by their securities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\5\ Claims on, or guaranteed by, states or other politicalsubdivisions of countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group ofcountries are to be placed in the 100 percent risk weight category. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Category 3_50 Percent Risk Weight. </T3>This category includes loansfully secured by first liens on <T3>one-to-four family residential </T3>properties,\2\\6\<NOTE/> either owner-occupied or rented, provided that such loanshave been approved in accordance with prudent underwriting standards, includingstandards relating to the loan amount as a percent of the appraised valueof the property,\2\\7\<NOTE/> and provided that the loans are not more than 90 days pastdue or carried in a nonaccrual status.\2\\8\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\6\ The types of properties that qualify as one-to-fourfamily residential properties are listed in the instructions for preparationof the Consolidated Reports of Condition and Income. If a bank holds thefirst and junior lien(s) on a residential property and no other party holdsan intervening lien, the transactions will be treated as a single loansecured by a first lien.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\7\ For risk-based capital purposes, the loan-to-valueratio generally is based upon the most current appraised value of the property.The appraisal should be performed in a manner consistent with the Federalbanking agencies' real estate appraisal guidelines and with the bank'sown appraisal guidelines. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\8\ Real estate loans that do not meet all of the specifiedcriteria or that are made for the purpose of property development are placedin the 100 percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="21">Also included in this category are <T3>privately-issued mortgage-backed securities </T3>provided that: (1)the structure of the security meets the criteria described above for ``Mortgage-BackedSecurities;'' (2) if the security is backed by a pool of conventional mortgages,<T3>each </T3>underlying mortgage meets the criteria described in thissection for inclusion in the 50 percent risk weight category at the timethe pool is originated; and (3) if the security is backed by privately-issuedmortgage-backed securities, <T3>each </T3>underlying security qualifies for inclusion in the 50 percentrisk category.\2\\9\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\9\ Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities that donot meet these criteria or that do not qualify for a lower risk weightgenerally are assigned to the 100 percent risk weight category.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes <T3>revenue </T3>(non-general obligation) bonds or similar obligations,including loans and leases, that are obligations of states or politicalsubdivisions of the United States or other OECD countries, but for whichthe government entity is committed to repay the debt with revenues fromthe specific projects financed, rather than from general tax funds (e.g.,municipal revenue bonds). In addition the credit equivalent amount of <T3>interest rate </T3>and <T3>foreign exchange rate </T3>related contracts that do not qualify fora lower risk weight are assigned to the 50 percent risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Category 4_100 Percent Risk Weight</T3>. All assets not included inthe above risk categories are assigned to this category, which comprisesstandard risk assets. Long-term claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD banks,and all claims on non-OECD central governments that entail some degreeof transfer risk are assigned to the 100 percent risk category.\3\\0\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\0\ Such assets include all non-local currency claims onnon-OECD central governments and those portions of local currency claimson, or guaranteed by, non-OECD central governments that exceed the localcurrency liabilities held by the bank.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes all claims on foreign and domestic privatesector obligors that are not assigned to lower risk weight categories,including: loans to nondepository financial institutions and bank holdingcompanies; claims on commercial firms owned by the public sector; customerliabilities to the bank on acceptances outstanding involving standard riskclaims; \31\<NOTE/> investments in fixed assets, premises and other real estatedowned; common and preferred stock of corporations, including stock acquiredfor debt previously contracted; commercial and consumer loans (except thoseloans assigned to lower risk categories due to recognized guarantees orcollateral); real estate loans and mortgage-backed securities that do notmeet the criteria for assignment to a lower risk weight (including anyclasses of mortgage-backed securities that can absorb more than their<T3> pro rata</T3> share of loss without the whole issue being in default,such as subordinated classes or residual interests); and all stripped mortgage-backedsecurities, including interest-only (IOs) and principal-only (POs) strips.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\31\ Customer liabilities on acceptances outstanding involvingnon-standard risk claims, such as claims on U.S. depository institutions,are assigned to the risk category appropriate to the identity of the obligoror, if relevant, the nature of the collateral or guarantees backing theclaim. Portions of acceptances conveyed as risk participations to U.S.depository institutions or foreign banks should be assigned to the 20 percentrisk category that is appropriate for short-term claims guaranteed by U.S.depository institutions and foreign banks.<ITAG tagnum="21">Also included in this category are industrial development bonds andsimilar obligations issued under the auspices of state or political subdivisionsof the OECD-based group of countries for the benefit of a private partyor enterprise where that party or enterprise, rather than the governmententity, is obligated to pay the principal and interest, and all obligationsof states or political subdivisions of countries that do not belong tothe OECD-based group of countries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Unless already deducted from capital for risk-based capital purposes,the following assets also are included in the 100 percent risk category:investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries, joint ventures or associatedcompanies; instruments that qualify as capital issued by other banks; andmortgage servicing rights and other allowed intangibles.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73"/><T3>D. Conversion Factors for Off-Balance Sheet Items</T3> (see Table III)<ITAG tagnum="21">The face amount of an off-balance sheet item is generally multipliedby a<T3> credit conversion factor</T3> and the resulting<T3> credit equivalent amount</T3> is assigned to the appropriate riskcategory according to the obligor or, if relevant, the guarantor or thenature of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.<T3> Items With a 100 Percent Conversion Factor.</T3> A 100 percent conversionfactor applies to<T3> direct credit substitutes,</T3> which include<T3> guarantees,</T3> or equivalent instruments, backing<T3> financial</T3> claims, such as securities, loans or other financialobligations, or backing off-balance sheet items that require capital underthe risk-based capital framework. These direct credit substitutes include<T3> financial standby letters of credit,</T3> or other equivalent irrevocableundertakings or surety arrangements, that effectively guarantee repaymentof financial obligations such as: commercial paper, tax-exempt securities,commercial or individual loans or other debt obligations, or standby orcommercial letters of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For risk-based capital purposes, financial standby letters of credit(100 percent conversion factor) are distinguished from loan commitments(normally a 50 percent conversion factor) in that financial standbys areirrevocable obligations of the bank to pay a third-party beneficiary whena customer (account party)<T3> fails to repay</T3> an outstanding loan or debt instrument. A loancommitment, on the other hand, involves an obligation (with or withouta material adverse change clause) of the bank to provide funds to its customer<T3> in the normal course</T3> of business should the customer seek todraw down the commitment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the distinguishing characteristics of a financial standbyletter of credit for risk-based capital purposes is the combination ofirrevocability with the notion that funding is triggered by some failureto repay or perform on a financial obligation. Thus, any commitment (bywhatever name) that involves an<T3> irrevocable</T3> obligation to make a payment to the customer or toa third party in the event the customer<T3> fails to repay</T3> an outstanding debt obligation will be treated,for risk-based capital purposes, as a financial standby letter of creditand assigned a 100 percent conversion factor. (Performance-related standbyletters of credit are assigned a conversion factor of 50 percent.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A bank that has conveyed<T3> risk participation</T3> \32\<NOTE/> in a direct credit substitute to a third party should convertthe full amont of the direct credit substitute at a 100 percent conversionfactor without deducting the risk participations conveyed. However, portionsof direct credit substitutes that have been conveyed as risk participationsto U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks may than be assigned tothe 20 percent risk category that is appropriate for claims guaranteedby U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks, rather than to the riskcategory appropriate to the account party obligor.\33\<NOTE/> A bank acquiring a risk participation in a direct creditsubstitute or bankers acceptance should convert the participation at 100percent and then assign the credit equivalent amount to the risk categorythat is appropriate to the account party obligor or, if relevant, the guarantoror the nature of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\32\ That is, participations in which the originating bankremains liable to the beneficiary for the full amount of the direct creditsubstitute if the party that has acquired the participation fails to paywhen the instrument is drawn upon.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\33\ Risk participations with a remaining maturity of oneyear or less that are conveyed to non-OECD banks are also assigned to the20 percent risk weight category.<ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of direct credit substitutes that are structured in theform of a<T3> syndication</T3> as defined in the instructions for the preparationof the Consolidated Reports of Condition and Income (that is, where eachbank is obligated only for its<T3> pro rata</T3> share of the risk and there is no recourse to the originatingbank), each bank will only include its<T3> pro rata</T3> share of the direct credit substitute in its risk-basedcapital calculation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Sale and repurchase agreements</T3> and<T3> asset sales with recourse,</T3> if not already included on the balancesheet, and<T3> forward agreements</T3> are also converted at 100 percent. For risk-basedcapital purposes, the definition of sales of assets with recourse, includingthe sales of participations in pools of residential mortgages, is consistentwith the definition contained in the instructions for the preparation ofthe Consolidated Reports of Condition and Income. ``Loan Strips'' and similararrangements involving short-term loans sold by a bank without direct recoursebut subject to long-term loan commitments by the bank are accorded thesame treatment as assets sold with recourse. Forward agreements are legallybinding contractual obligations to purchase assets with drawdown whichis<T3> certain</T3> at a specified future date. These obligations includeforward purchases, forward deposits placed, and partly-paid shares andsecurities, but do not include forward foreign exchange rate contractsor commitments to make residential mortage loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Securities lent</T3> by a bank are treated in one of two ways, dependingon whether the lender is exposed to risk of loss. If a bank, as agent fora customer, lends the customer's securities and is not obligated to indemnifythe customer against loss, the securities lending transaction is excludedfrom the risk-based capital calculation. On the other hand, if a bank lendsits own securities, or acting as agent lends the customer's securitiesand agrees to indemnify the customer against loss, the transaction is convertedat 100 percent and assigned to the risk weight category appropriate tothe obligor or, if applicable, to the collateral delivered to the lendingbank or to the independent custodian acting on the lending bank's behalf.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Items With a 50 Percent Conversion Factor. </T3>Transaction-relatedcontingencies are to be converted at 50 percent. Such contingencies includebid bonds, performance bonds, warranties, and <T3>performance standby letters of credit</T3> related to particular transactions,as well as acquisitions of risk participations in performance standby lettersof credits. Performance standby letters of credit (performance bonds) areirrevocable obligations of the bank to pay a third-party beneficiary whena customer (account party) <T3>fails to perform</T3> on some contractual nonfinancial obligation.Thus, performance standby letters of credit represent obligations backingthe performance of <T3>nonfinancial</T3> or <T3>commercial</T3> contracts or undertakings. To the extent permittedby law or regulation, performance standby letters of credit include arrangementsbacking, among other things, subcontractors' and suppliers' performance,labor and materials contracts, and construction bids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The unused portion of<T3> commitments</T3> with an <T3>original</T3> maturity exceeding <T3>one year</T3>,\34\<NOTE/> including underwriting commitments and commercial and consumercredit commitments, also are to be converted at 50 percent. Original maturityis defined as the length of time between the date the commitment is issuedand the earliest date on which: (1) the bank can at its option, <T3>unconditionally</T3> (without cause) cancel the commitment,\35\<NOTE/> and (2) the bank is scheduled to (and as a normal practiceactually does) review the facility to determine whether or not it shouldbe extended and, on at least an annual basis, continues to regularly reviewthe facility. Facilities that are unconditionally cancelable (without cause)at any time by the bank are not deemed to be commitments, provided thebank makes a separate credit decision before each drawing under the facility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\34\ Remaining maturity may be used for determining the termto maturity for loan commitments through year-end 1992; thereafter, originalmaturity shall be used.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\35\ In the case of home equity or mortgage lines of creditsecured by liens on one-to-four family residential properties, a bank isdeemed able to unconditionally cancel the commitment if, at its option,it can prohibit additional extensions of credit, reduce the credit line,and terminate the commitment to the full extent permitted by relevant Federallaw.<ITAG tagnum="21">Commitments, for risk-based capital purposes, are defined as any arrangementsthat obligate a bank to extend credit in the form of loans or lease financingreceivables; to purchase loans, securities, or other assets; or to participatein loans and leases. Commitments also include overdraft facilities, revolvingcredit, home equity and mortgage lines of credit, and similar transactions.Normally, commitments involve a written contract or agreement and a commitmentfee, or some other form of consideration. Commitments are included in risk-weightedassets regardless of whether they contain ``material adverse change'' clausesor other provisions that are intended to relieve the issuer of its fundingobligation under certain conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of commitments structured as syndications where the bankis obligated only for its <T3>pro rata</T3> share, the risk-based capital framework includes onlythe bank's proportional share of such commitments. Thus, after a commitmenthas been converted at 50 percent, portions of commitments that have beenconveyed to other U.S. depository institutions or OECD banks, but for whichthe originating bank retains the full obligation to the borrower if theparticipating bank fails to pay when the commitment is drawn upon, willbe assigned to the 20 risk category. The acquisition of such a participationin a commitment would be converted at 50 percent and the credit equivalentamount would be assigned to the risk category that is appropriate for theaccount party obligor or, if relevant, to the nature of the collateralor guarantees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs), and other similar arrangements also are converted at 50 percent.These are facilities under which a borrower can issue on a revolving basisshort-term notes in its own name, but for which the underwriting bankshave a legally binding commitment either to purchase any notes the borroweris unable to sell by the rollover date or to advance funds to the borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Items With a 20 Percent Conversion Factor.</T3> Short-term, self-liquidating,trade-related contingencies which arise from the movement of goods areconverted at 20 percent. Such contingencies include <T3>commercial letters of credit</T3> and other documentary letters ofcredit collateralized by the underlying shipments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Items With a Zero Percent Conversion Factor</T3>. These include unusedportions of <T3>commitments</T3> with an <T3>original maturity </T3>of <T3>one year or less, </T3>or which are <T3>unconditionally cancellable </T3>at any time (provided a separate creditdecision is made before each drawing under the facility). Unused portionsof <T3>retail credit card lines</T3> and related plans are deemed to be short-termcommitments if the bank, in accordance with applicable law, has the unconditionaloption to cancel the credit line at any time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">E. Conversion Factors and Risk Weights for Interest Rate and ForeignExchange Rate Related Contracts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Credit equivalent amounts are to be computed for each of the followingoff-balance sheet interest rate and foreign exchange rate related instruments;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Interest Rate Related Contracts:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Single currency interest rate swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Basis swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Forward rate agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Interest rate options purchased (including caps, collars and floorspurchased).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks (includingwhen-issued securities and forward deposits accepted).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Foreign Exchange Rate Related Contracts:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Cross-Currency interest rate swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Forward foreign exchange rate contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Currency options purchased.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Over-the-counter options purchased are included in the risk-basedcapital framework and treated in the same way as the other interest rateand foreign exchange rate contracts. However, foreign exchange rate contractswith an original maturity of fourteen calendar days or less and insturmentstraded on exchanges that require daily payment of variation margin areexcluded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Credit Equivalent Amounts for Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange RateContracts.</T3> Credit equivalent amounts are to be calculated for eachindividual contract of the types listed above. To calculate the creditequivalent amount of its off-balance sheet interest rate and foreign exchangerate instruments, a bank should, for each contract, sum:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) the mark-to-market value \36\<NOTE/> (positive values only) of the contract (that is, its <T3>current</T3> credit exposure or replacement cost) and:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\36\ Mark-to-market values should be measured in dollars,regardless of the currency or currencies specified in the contract, andshould reflect changes in both interest (or foreign exchange) rates andin counterparty credit quality.<ITAG tagnum="21">(b) an estimate of the <T3>potential</T3> future increases in credit exposure over the remaininglife of the instrument.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For risk-based capital purposes, potential future credit exposureon a contract is determined by multiplying the notional principal amountof the contract, including contracts with negative mark-to-market values,by one of the following credit conversion factors, as appropriate:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8</C> <H1>Remaining maturity</H1><H1>Interest rate contracts</H1><H1>Foreign exchange rate contracts</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less<D>-0-</D><D>1.0%</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year<D>0.5%</D><D>5.0%</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because foreign exchange rate contracts involve an exchange of principalupon maturity, and exchange rates are generally more volatile than interestrates, higher conversion factors have been established for foreign exchangerate contracts than for interest rate contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No potential future credit exposure should be calculated for singlecurrency interest rate swaps on which payments are based upon two floatingrate indices (floating/floating or basis swaps); rather, the credit equivalentamount of these contracts should be calculated solely on the basis of theirmark-to-market values (positive values only).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Risk Weights for Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts.</T3>Once the credit equivalent amount for an interest rate and foreign exchangerate instrument has been determined, that amount generally should be assignedto a risk weight category according to the identity of the counterpartyor, if relevant, the nature of any collateral or guarantees. However, the<T3>maximum</T3> risk weight that will be applied to the credit equivalentamount of such instruments is 50 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In certain cases, credit exposures arising from the interest rateand foreign exchange rate instruments may already be reflected, in part,on the balance sheet. To avoid the double counting of such exposures inthe assessment of capital adequacy and in the assigning of risk weights,counterparty credit exposures arising from these instruments may need tobe excluded from balance sheet assets when calculating a bank's total risk-weightedasset figure. However, for the purposes of the risk-based capital framework,the <T3>netting</T3> of offsetting positions in swaps and similar contractsinvolving the same counterparty is recognized only when accomplished throughnetting by novation.\3\\7\<NOTE/> Other types of netting arrangements will not be recognized.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\7\ For risk-based capital purposes, netting by novationinvolves a written bilateral contract between two counterparties underwhich any obligation to the other counterparty to deliver a given currencyon a given date is automatically amalgamated with all other obligationsfor the same currency and value date, legally substituting one single netamount for the previous gross obligations.<ITAG tagnum="74">III. Minimum Risk-Based Capital Ratio</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">A. Minimum Risk-Based Capital Ratio After Transition Period</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Banks generally will be expected to meet a <T3>minimum</T3> ratio of qualifying total capital to risk-weighted assetsof <T3>8 percent,</T3> of which at least 4 percentage points should be inthe form of core capital (Tier 1). Any bank that does not meet the minimumrisk-based capital ratio, or whose capital is otherwise considered inadequate,generally will be expected to develop and implement a capital plan forachieving an adequate level of capital, consistent with the provisionsof this risk-based capital framework, the specific circumstances affectingthe individual bank, and the requirements of any related agreements betweenthe bank and the FDIC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B. Transitional Arrangements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The transition period commences with the adoption of this statementof policy and ends on December 31, 1992. Initially, this risk-based capitalframework does not establish a minimum level of capital. However, by year-end1990, banks generally will be expected to meet a minimum total capitalto risk-weighted assets ratio of 7.25 percent, at least one-half of whichshould be in the form of Tier 1 capital. For purposes of calculating thisinterim minimum ratio, the amount of the allowance for loan and lease lossesthat may be included as a supplementary capital element is limited to 1.5percent of risk-weighted assets. In addition, up to 10 percent of a bank'sTier 1 capital (before any deduction for disallowed intangibles) may consistof supplementary capital elements. Thus, the 7.25 percent interim ratioimplies a minimum ratio of Tier 1 capital to risk-weighted assets of approximately3.6 percent (or one-half of 7.25) and a minimum ratio of core capital elementsto risk-weighted assets of 3.25 percent (or nine-tenths of the Tier 1 capitalratio). By the end of 1992, a state nonmember bank's Tier 1 capital shouldconsist solely of core capital elements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">During the transition period, banks should monitor their risk-basedcapital ratios and work toward achieving the interim and final risk-basedcapital ratios. Any bank that has risk-based capital ratios of less than4 percent Tier 1 capital and 8 percent total capital should develop andimplement a capital plan for achieving those minimum standards by December31, 1992, and for achieving the interim minimum ratio of 7.25 percent byDecember 31, 1990. Banks that at present have a risk-based capital ratioin excess of 8 percent generally should not take any action that wouldcause the ratio to fall below 8 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table I._Definition of Qualifying Capital</T4><H1>Components</H1><H1>Minimum Requirements and Limitations After Transition Period.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Core Capital (Tier 1) </T3><D>Must equal or exceed 4% of risk-weighted assets.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Common stockholders' equity capital <D>No limit.\1\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Noncumulative perpetual preferred stock and any related surplus <D>No limit.\1\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Minority interests in equity capital accounts of consolidated subsidiaries<D>No limit.\1\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Less: All intangible assets other than mortgage servicing rights \2\<D>(\1\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Supplementary Capital (Tier 2) </T3><D>Total of Tier 2 is limited to 100% of Tier 1.\3\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Allowance for loan and lease losses <D>Limited to 1.25% of risk-weighted assets.\3\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Cumulative perpetual and long-term preferred stock (original maturityof 20 years or more), and any related surplus <D>No limit within Tier 2; long-term preferred is amortized for capitalpurposes as it approaches maturity.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Auction rate and similar preferred stock (both cumulative and non-cumulative)<D>No limit within Tier 2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Hybrid capital instruments (including mandatory convertible debt securities)<D>No limit within Tier 2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock (originalweighted average maturity of 5 years or more) <D>Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock are limitedto 50% of Tier 1 \3\ and amortized for capital purposes as they approachmaturity.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Deductions (from the sum of Tier 1 plus Tier 2) </T3><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Investments in banking and finance subsidiaries that are not consolidatedfor regulatory capital purposes <D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Intentional, reciprocal cross-holdings of capital securities issuedby banks <D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Other deductions (such as investments in other subsidiaries or in jointventures) as determined by supervisory authority <D>On case-by-case basis or as matter of policy after formal considerationof relevant issues.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Total Capital (Tier 1 + Tier 2 </T3>^ Deductions) <D>Must equal or exceed 8% of risk-weighted assets.</D><F>\1\ No express limits are placed on the amounts of nonvoting common,noncumulative perpetual preferred stock, minority interests, and mortgageservicing rights that may be recognized as part of Tier 1 capital. However,voting common stockholders' equity capital generally will be expected tobe the dominant form of Tier 1 capital and banks should avoid undue relianceon other Tier 1 capital elements.</F><F>\2\ In addition to mortgage servicing rights, certain other intangiblesmay be allowed in core capital if explicitly approved by the FDIC on aspecific case basis. All deductions are for capital purposes only; deductionswould not affect accounting treatment.</F><F>\3\ Amounts in excess of limitations are permitted but do not qualifyas capital.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Calculation of the Risk-Based Capital Ratio</ITAG>When calculating the risk-based capital ratio under the framework set forthin this statement of policy, qualifying total capital (the numerator) isdivided by risk-weighted assets (the denominator). The process of determiningthe numerator for the ratio is summarized in Table I. The calculation ofthe denominator is based on the risk weights and conversion factors thatare summarized in Tables II and III.When determining the amount of risk-weighted assets, balance sheet assetsare assigned an appropriate risk weight (see Table II) and off-balancesheet items are first converted to a credit equivalent amount (see TableIII) and then assigned to one of the risk weight categories set forth inTable II.The balance sheet assets and the credit equivalent amount of off-balancesheet items are then multiplied by the appropriate risk weight percentagesand the sum of these risk-weighted amounts is the gross risk-weighted assetfigure used in determining the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.Any items deducted from capital when computing the amount of qualifyingcapital may also be excluded from risk-weighted assets when calculatingthe denominator for the risk-based capital ratio.<ITAG tagnum="74">Table II._Summary of Risk Weights and Risk Categories </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 1_Zero Percent Risk Weight </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Cash (domestic and foreign). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Balances due from Federal Reserve Banks and central banks in otherOECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Direct claims on, and portions of claims unconditionally guaranteedby, the U.S. Treasury, U.S. Government agencies,\1\<NOTE/> or central governments in other OECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capital ratio,a U.S. Government agency is defined as an instrumentality of the U.S. Governmentwhose obligations are fully and explicitly guaranteed as to the timelyrepayment of principal and interest by the full faith and credit of theU.S. Government. <ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Direct local currency claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD centralgovernments (including non-OECD central banks), to the extent the bankhas liabilities booked in that currency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Gold bullion held in the bank's own vaults or in another bank'svaults on an allocated basis, to the extent that it is offset by gold bullionliabilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Federal Reserve Bank stock. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 2_20 Percent Risk Weight </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Cash items in the process of collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) All claims (long- and short-term) on, and portions of claims (long-and short-term) guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Short-term (remaining maturity of one year or less) claims on,and portions of short-term claims guaranteed by, non-OECD banks, includingnon-OECD central banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Portions of loans an dother claims conditionally guaranteed bythe U.S. Treasury, U.S. Government agencies,\1\ or central governmentsin other OECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Securities and other claims on, and portions of claims guaranteedby, U.S. Government-<T3>sponsored </T3>agencies.\2\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio, a U.S. Government-<T3>sponsored </T3>agency is defined as an agency originally establishedor chartered to serve public purposes specified by the U.S. Congress butwhose obligations are not <T3>explicitly </T3>guaranteed by the full faith and credit of the U.S.Government. <ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Portions of loans and other claims (including repurchase agreements)collateralized\3\<NOTE/> by securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. Treasury,U.S. Government agencies, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies or centralgovernments in other OECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\Degree of collateralization is determined by current marketvalue. <ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Portions of loans and other claims collateralized\3\ by cash ondeposit in the lending bank. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) General obligation claims on, and portions of claims guaranteedby, the full faith and credit of states or other political subdivisionsof OECD countries, including U.S. state and local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Claims on, and portions of claims guaranteed by, official multilaterallending institutions or regional development institutions in which theU.S. Government is a shareholder or a contributing member. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Portions of claims collateralized\3\ by securities issued byofficial multilateral lending institutions or regional development institutionsin which the U.S. Government is a shareholder or contributing member. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities representing indirectownership of U.S. Government agency or U.S. Government-sponsored agencysecurities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Investments in shares of mutual funds whose portfolios are permittedto hold only assets that qualify for the zero or 20 percent risk categories.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 3_50 Percent Risk Weight </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Loans fully secured by first liens on one-to-four family residentialproperties, provided that the loans were approved in accordance with prudentunderwriting standards and are not past due 90 days or more or carriedon a nonaccrual status. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Certain privately-issued mortgage-backed securities representingindirect ownership of a pool of residential loans that meet the criteriafor a 50 percent risk weight. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Revenue bonds or similar obligations, including loans and leases,that are obligations of U.S. state or political subdivisions of the UnitedStates or other OECD countries but for which the government entity is committedto repay the debt only out of revenues from the specific projects financed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchangerate related contracts, except for those assigned to a lower risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 4_100 Percent Risk Weight </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) All other claims on private obligors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD banks with a remaining maturityexceeding one year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Claims on non-OECD central governments that are not included initem 4 of Category 1 or item 3 of Category 2, and all claims on non-OECDstate and local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Obligations issued by U.S. state or local governments or otherOECD local governments (including industrial development authorities andsimilar entities) that are repayable solely by a private party or enterprise.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Premises, plant, and equipment; other fixed assets; and otherreal estate owned.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Investments in any unconsolidated subsidiaries, joint ventures,or associated companies_if not deducted from capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Instruments issued by other banking organizations that qualifyas capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Claims on commercial firms owned by the U.S. Government or foreigngovernments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) All other assets, including any intangible assets that are notdeducted from capital, and the credit equivalent amounts \4\<NOTE/> of off-balance sheet items not assigned to a lower risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ For each off-balance sheet item, a conversion factor (seeTable III) must be applied to determine the ``credit equivalent amount''prior to assigning the off-balance sheet item to a risk weight category.<ITAG tagnum="74">Table III._Credit Conversion Factors for Off-Balance Sheet Items </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">100 Percent Conversion Factor  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Direct credit substitutes, including general guarantees of indebtednessand guarantee-type instruments, such as standby letters of credit thatserve as financial guarantees for, or support the repayment of, loans,securities or commercial letters of credit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Acquisitions of risk participations in bankers acceptances andin such direct credit substitutes and financial standby letters of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse,if not already included on the balance sheet.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Forward agreements representing contractual obligations to purchaseassets, including financing facilities, with drawdown <T3>certain</T3> at a specified future date.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Securities lent, if the lending bank is exposed to risk of loss. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">50 Percent Conversion Factor  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Transaction-related contingencies, including bid bonds, performancebonds, warranties, and performance standby letters of credit backing thenonfinancial performance of other parties.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity \1\<NOTE/> exceeding one year, including underwriting commitments andcommercial credit lines.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Remaining maturity may be used until year-end 1990.  <ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs) and other similar arrangements.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">20 Percent Conversion Factor  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Short-term, self-liquidating, trade-related contingencies, includingcommercial letters of credit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Zero Percent Conversion Factor  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity \1\ ofone year or less.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Unused portions of commitments (regardless of maturity) whichare unconditionally cancelable at any time, provided a separate creditdecision is made before each drawing.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Credit Conversion for Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate RelatedContracts  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The total replacement cost of contracts (obtained by summing the positivemark-to-market values of contracts) is added to a measure of future potentialincreases in credit exposure. This future potential credit exposure measureis calculated by multiplying the total notional value of contracts by oneof the following credit conversion factors, as appropriate:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8  </C>   <H1>Remaining maturity  </H1><H1>Interest rate contracts (percent)  </H1><H1>Foreign exchange rate contracts (percent)  </H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less  <D>0  </D><D>1.0  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year  <D>0.5  </D><D>5.0  </D></ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">No potential exposure is calculated for single currency interest ratecontracts on which payments are made based on two floating rate indices(floating/floating or basis swaps); the credit exposure on these contractsis evaluated solely on the basis of their mark-to-market values. Exchangerate contracts with an original maturity of fourteen calendar days or lessare excluded from the risk-based capital framework. Instruments tradedon exchanges that require daily payment of variation margin also are excluded.Multiple contracts with the same counterparty may be netted for risk-basedcapital purposes only if the contracts are subject to netting by novation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">By order of the Board of Directors this 14th day of March, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Hoyle L. Robinson,  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Executive Secretary.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-6630 Filed 3-20-89; 8:45 am]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6714-01-M  </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>